Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What you get when you cross a badly-done veiled version of THE EXORCIST with
an MTV video directed by a man who might consider Tony Scott, Michael Bay
and Simon West as his modern-day directorial heroes? Read on.
PLOT:
Mary Jane Nobody gets inflicted by the stigmata, a condition in which a
person is physically impaled like Jesus was on the cross. Being an atheist,
she doesn't understand why this is happening to her, and neither does the
brooding priest/scientist who comes from the Vatican to investigate the
supernatural event.
CRITIQUE:
The answer to the question from above is that you get STIGMATA, a film which
relies mostly on style and mood, and leaves the story element far away in
the backseat. I personally do enjoy films with a lot of stylish camera
tricks, but this one went a little overboard, with an overabundance of shots
featuring water dripping down, tight close-ups, slow motion scenes, quick
edits and loud music. This wouldn't have been too bad if the story had
enough meat to straddle my interest, but unfortunately, I was bored after
the first hour of watching Patricia Arquette get bloodied over and over
again, without much else going on. Redundancy, you have a name and it is
Stigmata! This film also features a drab resolution, which fortunately for
me, I could have cared less about at that time (And were those the worst
looking fake flames you have ever seen in the last scene?? Yikes!). One
thing's for sure, I ain't much into religion, but I can't imagine anyone
from the church being too much of a happy camper after seeing this flick.
On the positive tip, I sure did enjoy the soundtrack which proved that
Smashing Pumkin Billy Corgan could sure do a great Trent Reznor impression,
and the performance by Patricia Arquette, which was excellent as a cute,
hip, young chick who anyone, at least in our generation, could relate to.
And how about all of her funky getups and apartment fillers? Very kewl!
Byrne was okay as the Jason Miller part from the original EXORCIST, but did
they have to toss in a cheesy romance? Not my bag. Anyway, all in all, this
film might satisfy some folks who love the MTV-style movies with little plot
development despite a lot of movement, and Patricia Arquette fans, but
thriller fans, lovers of the supernatural genre, will not find anything to
get excited about in this bombastic retread. And despite not appreciating
the film's story line, I do mark it higher than usual, because I personally
do like Patricia Arquette and enjoyed some of its stylish intent.
Unfortunately, the director went too far in this area, believing himself to
be directing an action/adventure film instead of a taut thriller.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
I really did not know this fact before I wrote my actual review, but after
reading through some of the studio's production notes, it was a nice
confirmation to find out that director Rupert Wainwright was once an
acclaimed commercial and music video director! Score one for the home team.
:) He directed commercials for clients ranging from Reebok and Sprint, to
music videos for Michael Jackson and NWA. His first major directing gig was
1994's BLANK CHECK for Walt Disney.
Born in Chicago, but raised in Southern California, actress Patricia
Arquette is surrounded by actors in her family. Her father Lewis and
grandfather Cliff started it all, while her siblings Rosanna, Richmond,
David and Alexis continuing it alongside her today. This must be a widely
known fact by now, but Patricia has been married to actor Nicolas Cage since
1995. However, the way they got together is quite interesting: Cage proposed
to Patricia on the day he met her in the early 80s. Arquette thought he was
a bit strange but played along with his antics by creating a list of things
Cage would have to fulfil to win her (Like a black rose, J.D. Salinger's
autograph, etc...). When he started to work his way through the list,
Arquette got scared and avoided him. They met again many years later and
later went on to marry.
Gabriel Byrne comes straight out of Dublin, Ireland, and professes to be a
Catholic. He's also had quite a life. He only started acting at the age of
29 and came to America for the first time when he was 37. Before becoming an
actor, he was an archeologist, a schoolteacher, a short-order cook and a
bullfighter. He was also married to actress Ellen Barkin for about ten
years.
Actress Nia Long's career got started by Betty A. Bridges, mother of actor
Todd Bridges AKA ex-Different Strokes cast member. Betty was her acting
coach for 15 years
Billy Corgan's previous experience in composing music for film includes Mel
Gibson's RANSOM, which he partly scored.
This film was originally titled TOBY'S STORY.

Author
Jamey Hughton
While technically well-made, Stigmata never possesses a very logical
story or enough originality to warrant a recommendation. It's a
spiritual thriller that most audiences will either find offensive or
preposterous, depending on their religious view-point. The plot asks for
too much of the viewer's co-operation, and the film itself is an
all-together numbing experience for all who get involved.
The Stigmata are the wounds of Christ on the wrists, feet and back.
Certain religious individuals have been afflicted by these bizarre
lacerations over the years. The latest victim appears to be single
hair-dresser Frankie Page (Patricia Arquette), who has began suffering
strange demonic attacks. On more than one occasion, Frankie is admitted
to a hospital with bleeding wounds that appear to be self-inflicted.
It's only after a public attack on a subway train that the Vatican
begins to take notice. They send a Roman Catholic Priest named Andrew
Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne) to investigate the phenomenon, and see for
himself whether the Stigmata are involved. One argument to prove
otherwise is that Frankie does not attend church, and the victims are
always `deeply religious people'.
Video director Rupert Wainwright is behind the camera for Stigmata, and
his sense of style oozes through every frame. The entire movie is shot
in a bizarre tone of bleached colors. It looks as if Wainwright was
glazed over the film, accentuating certain colors with a neon tint and
blocking out others. He also uses stylish camera work, but
unfortunately, this approach grows tiresome after a while. It seems as
if when one aspect of the production is working, the other is flagging
hopelessly behind. The set-up of the story is awful, but the movie looks
great. Then, as the plot shifts into high gear, the film develops into a
reasonably competent thriller. Of course, by this time, the quick-flash
editing and camera trickery are getting old (not to mention tough on the
eyes). If you're a very patient person and you love Patricia Arquette,
then Stigmata is definitely for you.
For others, I would advise to stay clear. Some people are not going to
be very pleased with the religious undertones presented here. As the
story develops, the Cardinal (Jonathan Pryce) becomes worried that the
new reports could destroy the Vatican. But, despite some obvious
potential, there are few twists and turns involved in the initial story.
There's nothing particularly fresh or new. Just a plot that delivers an
occasional jolt to maintain the viewer's interest, including graphic
attack sequences that will make your head spin in a dizzying rage. Some
of these bloody scenes could have been toned down, in violence and
momentum.
The cast is quite good. Arquette is perfect in her role as the tormented
twenty-something victim, but it's the Vatican members who make the
biggest impression. The talented Byrne plays Kiernan as a wise and
authoritative individual, even when his actions seem relatively
implausible. In minor supporting roles, Pryce and Rade Sherbedgia are
both commanding. Without the willing participation of these actors,
Stigmata would have been a big, bloated mess.
It's not very pretty as it is, but the movie has some strengths. The
director does a fair job of involving the audience in the mindless muck,
and some of the information is moderately interesting. But all of this
is only to a point. Once Stigmata abandons it's over-the-top approach
and begins leaning toward a more conventional thriller, things
(ironically) improve. Wainwright, though, demands too much attention for
a feature-length film, and should stick to the MTV profession.
Who exactly is this movie for? People wanting a revised story of The
Exorcist? Even those loyal followers may be frustrated by this mixed bag
of spiritual shenanigans.  Sorry folks, no flying green phlegm here.
Contact Jamey at:  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Homer Yen
My friends will tell you that I'm not very religious.  I'm not an avid
churchgoer, and I'm sure that there is much that I will have to atone
for when I am finally reviewed for entry at the Pearly Gates.  Saint
Peter will probably ask me how much I know about the teachings of
Jesus, to which my answer will undoubtedly disappoint the heavenly
gatekeeper.  But despite my lack of faith, I DO know that the
scriptwriters of `Stigmata' will be taking the express elevator to that
other place because this film, based deeply on some Christian
underpinnings, recklessly throws away any semblance of theology out the
window.
The first such absurd example involves some rosary beads that contain a
supernatural spirit.  Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette) receives this
as a gift from Mom who bought it on the streets of a small Brazilian
town.  Frankie lives a normal stress-free life comprised of days
piercing nipples at her beauty salon and nights hanging out with her
girlfriends at the local clubs.  But soon after the receipt of her
gift, horrifying and unexplainable phenomenon begins to happen.  First,
holes mysteriously appear in her wrists as if something had driven a
stake through it.  She is rushed to the hospital where the doctors
think that she is suicidal.  A few days go by and some unseen force
severely lashes her back.  The doctors have no rational explanation. 
These events catch the attention of the Vatican who dispatches Father
Andrew (Gabriel Byrne) to investigate.  His sole purpose is to disprove
so-called miracles.  He is extremely skeptical about Frankie because
she is a self-professed atheist.  However, when the next miracle occurs
(her forehead is mysteriously slashed), he tells her of the Stigmata.
Father Andrew explains that experiencing the Stigmata is like a
miraculous gift from God.  Jesus suffered these exact same wounds. 
There were five wounds in all, including the staking of the feet and a
spear through the body.  `But Jesus died,' Frankie blurts out.  `Can I
give these gifts back,' she asks?  I would think that having such a
gift, though obviously painful, would be glorious and inspiring.  But
the movie portrays this as some sort of dark, demonic possession. 
Frankie (or actually the spirit that possesses her) begins to madly
etch out incomprehensible symbols and speak in a deep satanic voice. 
Both of these, we are told, are Aramaic, a long-forgotten dialect used
in the time of Jesus.  What is she writing?  What is she saying?  Are
these the actual words of Christ?
At this point, a new plot develops that takes this film in a completely
new direction.  Upon learning of this new development, the Vatican
leaders (headed by Jonathan Pryce) tell Father Andrew to conclude his
investigation immediately.  They are afraid of something and take it
into their own hands to address the issue of Frankie's miracles. 
Father Andrew, however, is determined to know the truth.  Think X-Files
where the enemy is the Vatican.
Does any of this make sense?  Well, if you were confused about religion
before, this can only add fuel to the fire.  It thinks that rosary
beads can contain spirits, it confuses miracles with possession, and it
portrays the Vatican as the instrument of an ongoing conspiracy.  I
also found this movie irritating in many ways.  I especially disliked
the sequences when she experienced Stigmata, which I though was
needlessly bloody and overly dramatic.  I also didn't care for the
accompanying sound effects which were grating and used exaggerated
noises (honking of horns, fluttering of wings) to try to add tension. 
There are some good ideas at work here including very nice
cinematography and grounding Frankie in a blue-collar atmosphere to
show that miracles can happen to the most common of folk.  But her role
is simply impossible and this film doesn't convince us that it is a
drama or a thriller or anything else other than something that is
masquerading as a horror film.

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999.
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Thomas
Kopache, Rade Serbedzija, Enrico Colantoni, Dick Latessa, Portia de Rossi.
Written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage.
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Rated R.
If anything, "Stigmata" should be taken as a warning against releasing
similarly-themed films relatively close to one another. Of the four
supernatural horror flicks released this year, it is clearly the worst. I
suppose I should have seen this coming. After all, "Blair Witch" thoroughly
creeped me out, "Sixth Sense" was mildly spooky, and then "Stir of Echoes"
had its moments, but wasn't anything I'd lose sleep over. Clearly, the
quality of the horror this summer has slowly been dropping. Is it then any
surprise that "Stigmata" is the dullest, most horribly executed piece of
MTV-influenced tripe I have seen in a long while? No, not really.
Patricia Arquette plays Frankie Page, a hairdresser from Pittsburgh who
receives a rosary as a gift from her globe-trotting mother. As it turns out,
the rosary belonged to a recently-deceased Brazilian priest. The priest's
church had been under investigation by Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne)
because of the mysterious appearance of a bleeding statue. Father Kiernan is
an investigator who has made a career out of disproving supposed religious
signs, but this time he believes there is something to the bleeding statue.
His investigation is soon called off, however, when the Frankie starts
exhibiting signs of the stigmata, in which a person is inflicted with wounds
like that of Jesus Christ. Father Kiernan is initially skeptical of Frankie'
s story, considering she's an atheist, but once he witnesses the stigmata
attacks himself, he dedicates himself to finding out what is going on. He
eventually begins to suspect that his boss, Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan
Pryce), is concealing something that could bring down the Catholic Church.
As it turns out, the dead priest had been working on the translation of a
"fifth gospel" before they were excommunicated.
The new Rupert Wainwright music video . . . I mean film "Stigmata" is the
sort of film that starts off OK and only gets worse. Indeed, it would have
been good if it were a music video, because it's only interesting for about
five minutes. I'm not sure what Wainwright is trying to prove with his
endless parade of slow-motion, double-exposure, and extreme close-ups
(Whoaaaaaa!!!!), other than the fact that he has the most swelled head of
any director in Hollywood and, yes, he has been to film school. His camera
trickery is interesting for a little while, but eventually, it becomes
headache-inducing. What this film needed is a second audio track to be
played over the dialogue (such as it is), with Wainwright screaming at the
audience, "See? Look at what I can do! I'm an EX-cellent dir-ECT-or." Maybe
then he'd explain why he decided to start half of his scenes with
slow-motion shots of water dripping in reverse, or why he included random
superfluous shots as that of an egg frying (ooh, scary!). If there was some
underlying meaning behind all this camera trickery, I didn't see it. Just
when you thought it was safe to get involved in the story, here comes a
double-exposure shot of two Patricia Arquettes collapsing into bed for no
reason whatsoever. Arrrrrrrghhhh . . .
Then again, the superfluous camera trickery wouldn't bother me if "Stigmata"
had a story or characters that were remotely engaging. Though Wainwright's
vanity certainly doesn't help, he does seem to have been given a nearly
unworkable script. Where are plot continuity and character development when
you need them? Case in point: Frankie Page is the character that (I assume)
we are supposed to identify and sympathize with, but we aren't given any
back story on her character, or any reason to like her. The extent of her
character development seems to be that she is a hard-working hairdresser
(who can somehow afford a cavernous apartment on the top floor of her
building) and she's kind of cute, so let's start the bleeding! The fact that
she's clearly not the brightest bulb in the drawer doesn't help, either.
According to Frankie Page, what is the first thing to do after receiving
mysterious wounds on your wrists and back? Go clubbing! Sure, that makes
sense. Arquette, Byrne, and Pryce give it the old college try, but their
characters are so one-dimensional that they just appear to be sleepwalking.
Scenes between Arquette and Byrne that were probably supposed to be sexually
charged fall almost embarrassingly flat, because the setup of the romantic
subplot is so clumsily handled that it almost reaches the point of becoming
laughable. Even though Frankie Page's life is falling apart before her very
eyes, she still finds the time to hit on a priest who wanders in to her hair
salon. Even more curiously, he seems to be interested in her advances.
Father Andrew's religious doubt pops up so suddenly that it seems more silly
than dramatic. As for Pryce, he may as well wear a curled mustache and
cackle, "I'll get you, my pretty," for all the depth his Cardinal Houseman
is afforded. Trust me, I'm not revealing anything by telling you Pryce turns
out to be a villain.
What's worse, after being faced with dull characters and the prospect of
having annoying camera tricks and loud music jammed down our throats, we now
have to contend with a story that starts off in one direction, veers off in
another, then another, and ends up being totally incomprehensible. First of
all, the film doesn't even bother to explain what should be very simple plot
details. How does Frankie get the stigmata merely by touching a rosary? How
come an atheist like her was chosen, since Father Andrew mentions that only
very devout believers have ever received stigmata? Actually, I'm not sure
what Frankie was posessed by. Supposedly, stigmata occurs when one is
posessed by the Holy Spirit, but the film later has her being posessed by
the dead priest, and later by some evil spirit (I think). Which one is it?
The answer to this question, of course, is very simple: the possessing
entity in each scene is determined by whichever effects and flashy camera
work Mr. Wainwright wants to use this time. Furthermore, the ending is a
ridiculously neat little wrap-up, and the filmmakers compound this problem
by ultimately turning the film into a diatribe against the Catholic Church.
If you do any research at all about the Gospel of St. Thomas, you'll find
that it is not being suppressed by the Church (as the film seems to claim),
but that it is readily available at your local library. There's nothing the
Catholics need to worry about, though. "Stigmata's" religion is so off-base
that it can't be confused for anything remotely resembling the real Catholic
Church. If they wanted to portray Catholic priests as mobsters, they should
have gone all-out and equipped them with sharkskin suits and tommy guns,
which would have been far more interesting. I'm not Catholic; in fact, I don
't care much for the Catholic Church, but its cartoonish misrepresentation
in this film should not be considered realistic by any means.
It's rare to see a film that fails on as many levels as "Stigmata" does. It'
s not thought-provoking, though it would like to be, and it is definitely
not scary, though it pretends to be. I'm not sure why they tried to pass
this off as a horror film, because there is absolutely nothing scary about
the story. Maybe it's an attempt to cover up the fact that none of the
scenes have any dramatic weight whatsoever. The initial shock of seeing
Arquette covered with blood is dulled by the fact that it happens over, and
over, and over. Like so many films of the MTV generation, this one suffers
from overkill. So much is overdone in "Stigmata," that it eventually has no
effect on the audience, leaving us to pick out the film's (many) flaws. I'm
also still trying to figure out why the quotation they take from the Gospel
of St. Thomas is so Earth-shattering. When we finally hear it, the saying
sounds like something every five-year-old learns on their first day of
Sunday School, which means that for all its flash, the whole film is really
much ado about nothing. The dog days of summer usually produce one monstrous
dog, and "Stigmata" is it.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Ross Anthony
Stigmata isn't just a cool/scary sounding word, nor is it Mitsubishi's
newest sportscar. It's what people are called who bare the wounds of the
crucifixion of Jesus Christ. Usually these people are devout in faith, but
not Frankie Paige; she's a free spirit, happy-go-lucky, partying
hairdresser.
Think you've had a bad day? Frankie gets nailed to the wall at the drop of a
hat (or holy water in this case). It's enough to make you cry tears of
blood.
But "Stigmata" the movie isn't all special effects of torture. Though the
writers may hammer it through your bones a little harder than necessary, the
theme is relevant and strong.
Good point aside, the picture suffered from a slow start, mediocre
soundtrack, expository dialogue in a Vatican scene, some sticky editing
choices and near miss intensities. And then there's the implausibilities.
Example 1: Frankie is attacked by an unseen force in a public dance hall
(okay, I'm believing that). Bleeding from the head and delusional she fleas
from the club, her best friend first gets her rain coat on before running
after (I can't believe that). Example 2: Admitted to the hospital for
puncture wounds clear through both wrists, she's assumed to be a suicide
victim (How would one drive a nail through that second wrist?).
Still, the picture had it's moments, I had my share of chills and as I said
... good point.
Stigmata, Copyright Š. 102 minutes. Rated R.
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce.
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage.
Produced by Frank Mancuso, JR at MGM and FGM Entertainment.
(C) 1999. 102 minutes. Rated R.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 21, 2000; certificate 18; 102 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Rupert Wainwright; produced by Frank Mancuso Jr.
Written by Tom Lazarus, Rick Ramage.
Photographed by Jeffrey L Kimball; edited by Michael J Duthie, Michael R 
Miller.
"Stigmata" starts as a badly made film, proceeds as a muddled one and ends up 
as psychotic. The final moments of this movie attack the Roman Catholic 
Church in the manner of a deranged ex-girlfriend -- wasting our time, 
solemnly declaring ridiculous accusations, making a lot of noise but no sense.
The first act introduces us to Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), an 
attractive Pittsburgh hairdresser who exists in one of those fairytale movie 
worlds where, at work, she walks in to find everyone greeting her like she's 
just come back from holiday, and, at night, she always gets to her favourite 
night club to find her friends already waiting there. There are lots of 
lingering close-ups of her drinks and cigarettes; look, kids, she's 
naughty... this is what big grown-up people call a 'wanton lifestyle'!
Meanwhile a priest played by Gabriel Byrne, Father Andrew Kiernan, is 
travelling around the world investigating reports of miracles. He's an 
objective, scientific fellow, we learn, who would never be taken in by a 
hoax. But when he assesses a statue of the Virgin Mary that cries blood, and 
comes to the conclusion that the relic is genuine, the cardinals at the 
Vatican don't pay it any mind.
Instead, they just send him on another assignment, this time to examine 
Frankie. She has been seen reacting to hallucinations and displaying signs of 
stigmata, a phenomenon whereby Christians with strong faith and empathy with 
Jesus will break out in the wounds their saviour suffered on the cross. But 
Frankie is an atheist, and the pointless middle of "Stigmata", which is a 
battle to stay awake through, mentions this discrepancy a lot without 
actually explaining it. Instead, every "How could this happen to me?" moment 
is interrupted by jarring music chords and fits of screaming, as Frankie 
freaks out like Linda Blair in "The Exorcist".
Is she possessed by something evil, as Blair's character was? I'm still not 
sure. If I followed the movie correctly, the soul of a dead Catholic priest 
has invaded her by storing his soul in magic rosary beads, to use her as a 
messenger and announce his discovery of Christ's own version of the Gospel. 
The stigmata is a side-effect of all the holy phenomena floating around, and 
this joyful miracle only seems like an attack by a demonic force because the 
priest is so darn angry at the state of the Vatican.
This is ridiculous, but gets even more farfetched, when the film explicitly 
accuses Catholicism of being a conspiracy against God. Just before the end 
credits, factoids and statistics appear onscreen to tell us how many reports 
of miracles the Vatican have dismissed as fake. That the director, Rupert 
Wainwright, could think this is serious evidence of corruption suggests he's 
the kind of guy who would look at the circus antics of a kooky talk show like 
"Jerry Springer" and declare them to contain compelling social exposé. Even 
his visual style gets on my nerves -- from the outset he keeps switching 
between grainy documentary realism and saturated slow-motion montages of bad 
dance music, which play like demented Coca-Cola commercials.
Watching Gabriel Byrne in this movie, I pondered the possibility that he 
enjoys deliberately appearing in bad religious pictures. Only a few weeks ago 
he played Satan in "End of Days", which, like "Stigmata", used half-baked 
knowledge about Catholicism as an excuse for a lot of ugly gore and noise. 
Byrne is a good actor; if you ever pass by a film set and see him, try to get 
his autograph. If you see a crucifix anywhere nearby, though, ask him the 
title of the movie he's working on and tell all your friends to avoid it.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "STIGMATA" (MGM)
         In a season when there have been some really scary horror
pictures ("Blair Witch Project," "Sixth Sense," "Stir of Echoes"),
this garish, overwrought hodge-podge of symbols, icons, and loud
sound-effects just doesn't measure up. Stigmata are bleeding injuries
that resemble the wounds inflicted Jesus' head, hands, feet, an back
during the crucifixion. The occurrence of stigmata is neither well
understood nor extensively documented in Christian mythology but those
afflicted are usually deeply religious, often hysterical, and regard
their condition as a gift from God. The story begins as Patricia
Arquette, as a sullen 23 year-old Pittsburgh hairdresser, an atheist,
receives an old rosary as a souvenir from her mother, who was
vacationing in Brazil. Within 24 hours after she touches the ancient
circlet of black beads, she experiences a painful, deep puncture wound
in each wrist, the first of five stigmata. The second, a
criss-crossing of her back with the lashes of an invisible whip,
occurs while she's riding on a subway - to the horror of a nearby
priest, who contacts the Vatican about the bizarre incident. A
sinister Cardinal, played by Jonathan Pryce, sends a Jesuit Father,
that's Gabriel Byrne, to investigate what turns out to be the
supernatural channeling of a malevolent spirit. At the bottom of it
all, screenwriters Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage, along with director
Rupert Wainwright, assert that there's more corruption in the
contemporary Catholic church than anyone wants to admit.  On the
Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Stigmata" is a gruesome, grisly
3. It's a bloody bore - and an insult to those who have faith in the
Catholic doctrine.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Stigmata (1999)
Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Patrick 
Muldoon, Portia de Rossi, Rade Sherbedgia. Music by Billy Corgan, Elia 
Cmiral, Mike Garson. Screenplay by Tom Lazarus, Rick Ramage. Directed by 
Rupert Wainwright. 102 minutes.
Rated R, 1.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
Imagine a reverse spin on "The Exorcist," all trussed up with MTV-style 
graphics, and you'll have a fair idea of what to expect from "Stigmata," 
an overwrought horror story burdened by sluggish pacing, a lame 
screenplay with a distinct lack of internal logic and an insufferable 
soundtrack. Despite its laundry list of flaws, I still got caught up in 
the story, which appeared to be building towards a climax that would make 
some profound statement, only to watch the film deflate like a cheap air 
mattress with a faulty stem. For all its posturing, "Stigmata" is much 
bloody ado about nothing.
It begins in a tiny village, where Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne) 
investigates reports of a religious statue that bleeds profusely. Father 
Kiernan, who travels the world serving as a sort-of miracle cop for the 
Vatican, remains remarkably subdued even when the statue weeps bloody 
tears. When the phenomena reoccurs, accompanied by birds flying through 
the church and great bursts of wind blowing out the chapel candles, which 
spontaneously re-ignite around 30 seconds later, the padre is suitably 
impressed and reports his findings to the big boys in Rome. His boss, the 
creepy Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce), merely glowers and instructs 
him to pack up the statue and have it sent to the church labs for study. 
Cut to Pittsburgh, where hairdresser Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette) 
has her own set of troubles. After her mother sends her a rosary stolen 
from the body of the priest from the aforementioned church, Frankie 
experiences bizarre attacks where she spontaneously bleeds from her hands,
 head or feet. Not only are the occurrences terrifying and painful, but 
the red clashes with her trendy outfits. Doctors can't determine why this 
is happening, frustrating the hip young atheist even more. To make 
matters worse, Frankie's boyfriend Steven (Patrick Muldoon) begins to 
distance himself from her and even her girlfriends Donna (Nia Long) and 
Jennifer (Portia de Rossi) start looking at her as if she was Linda Blair.
Enter Father Kiernan, who explains the situation to Frankie. Stigmata is 
the appearance of wounds on a body in the five exact places where the 
crucified Christ was pierced. Those who experience stigmata are deeply 
religious people, like Saint Francis of Assisi, who lost a pint a day, 
according to the Father. He fears for Frankie, because no one except her 
has ever displayed more than two of the wounds at the same time. If she 
simultaneously shows all five, the result may be death. 
A number of questions arise at this point. Even with magic rosary beads, 
why is an atheist experiencing a phenomena that affects only the 
extremely faithful? Why do those who witness this full-fledged miracle 
react solely with horror instead of wonder? Where are the cops and the 
media when Frankie runs into the street and causes a series of car wrecks?
 Why are her attacks scored with annoying music from Smashing Pumpkins 
leader Billy Corgan? How does a hairdresser afford the largest apartment 
in Pittsburgh? And what the hell is an actor of Gabriel Byrne's caliber 
doing in a cheesy movie like this?
The prime subplot of "Stigmata" is far more interesting than all the 
"Exorcist" histrionics, but it turns out to be both anticlimactic and 
illogical. (SPOILER ALERT: the following reveals significant plot points) 
Cardinal Houseman and his cohorts strive to stifle Father Kiernan's 
investigation. It seems that there exists another gospel, written by 
Christ himself. Certain Catholics, including the late priest from the 
little church, were close to revealing the writings and the Vatican 
baddies fear that Christ's message would destroy their lucrative 
organization. 
While intriguing, the subplot has two big problems. First, an elderly 
priest (Rade Serbedgia) who specializes in translations repeatedly states 
that the first-hand gospel has been lost forever, even though he holds 
sharp photographs of the scriptures in his hand. Second, when we finally 
hear the legendary message, it turns out to be a benign truism that most 
of us learned on the first day of Bible school. Is this simple message a 
threat to the very existence of the Catholic Church? I don't think so 
(END SPOILERS).
So we are left with a lurid horror show, edited in quick-cut MTV style 
and surrounded by quasi-alternative music. One of the reasons "The Sixth 
Sense" worked is because the filmmakers understood that the extraordinary 
is most effectively presented in a low-key fashion. "Stigmata" takes 
miracles and turns them into grandiose music videos, and while a few 
moments are genuinely disturbing, the bulk of the film plays like a big, 
dumb trip through an ecclesiastical spook house. 

Author
Curtis Edmonds
The year was 1990, the movie was Miller's Crossing, and the man was
Gabriel Byrne.  Byrne had the plum role of Tom Reagan, Irish gangster, a
smart guy in a tough town.  Byrne spent the whole movie laconically
spitting out hard-bitten Coen Brothers dialogue as if he were born to
it. He didn't have the Bogart charm but had all the Bogart flair, with
the cynical coolness thrown in.  Miller's Crossing didn't break any box
office records but has its place on many critic's ten best of the '90's
lists.  (Personally, I like Miller's Crossing better than Fargo, the
Coen Brothers movie that made the AFI 100 list.)
The year was 1993, the movie was True Romance, and the girl was Patricia
Arquette.  Arquette played Alabama Worley, who hooked up with Christian
Slater on a cross-country road trip in search of a better life through
drug trafficking.  True Romance was the movie that introduced us to a
young screenwriter named Quentin Tarantino, and there hasn't been a more
attractive performance in any Tarantino movie than Arquette's.  True
Romance is no Pulp Fiction, of course, but it has lots and lots of
things to like.
Hold on to these memories.  You'll need them if you go see Stigmata.
Arquette plays Frankie Paige, a Pittsburgh hairdresser working in the
Dennis Rodman Memorial Beauty Salon, offering a wide range of services
from hairstyles and manicures to tattoos and piercings.  Frankie is a
twenty-three year old party girl (Arquette is actually 31) hanging out
in the best dance clubs and coffee houses.  She lives in the type of
fabulously decorated Art Deco loft apartment you only see in the movies.
Arquette's mother (who we must assume is paying for all this) travels to
Brazil and sends her the rosary of a dead priest.  That evening,
Arquette is lounging in one of those bathtubs you only see in the
movies, surrounded by votive candles.  Suddenly a dove flies through the
apartment, all portentous and symbolic.  And then, to the tune of the
Smashing Pumpkins and with full music video accompaniment, big, bloody
holes appear in Arquette's wrists.  The shots of Arquette writhing in
pain are accompanied by close-ups of nails being driven into the wrists
of a crucified man to make sure we get the point:  Arquette is being
afflicted by the stigmata, the representation of the Five Wounds of
Christ on the cross.  (I count seven, but who am I to argue?)
There are four such scenes in the movie, with Arquette getting wounds on
her hands, head, feet, and back in slow motion.  (She's wearing platform
shoes in the scene where here feet are pierced, which makes for a
particularly silly vision.)  After the second such attack, Gabriel Byrne
shows up to investigate.  Byrne's character, a priest / organic chemist,
is the Vatican's answer to the Men in Black.  Or, if you like, he's the
keeper of the Catholic version of the X-Files.  His role is to
investigate paranormal happenings and either disprove them
scientifically or hide the evidence.  (One imagines him traveling to New
Mexico and surreptitiously scarfing down tortillas with Christ's image
on them.)
Anyway, Byrne reads about Arquette's stigmata through the Vatican's
press clipping service (one wonders if they get Weekly World News).  He
investigates briefly, initially dismissing the idea that the irreligious
Arquette could have stigmata.  However, after seeing the spirit of the
dead Brazilian priest possess Arquette in a rain-slicked alley, he
becomes a believer.  Things get even sillier from here, as the plot
begins to turn around a long-lost Gospel that has severe implications
to... er... the value of the Vatican's real estate holdings.  And it
gets even sillier when the plot threatens a romance between Byrne and
Arquette.
The problem with Stigmata is that it doesn't have any sense of humor to
balance out the sheer overwhelming preposterousness of the story.
There's a scene, late in the movie, where Arquette is possessed by a
demon, and it's almost exactly like a similar scene in Ghostbusters.
One almost expects Arquette to whisper huskily to Byrne, "Do you want
this body, sub-creature!"  But there's no levity to leaven the movie, no
sense by the actors that this is all just a colossal joke.
Stigmata is not a bad movie, in the sense of having bad acting or
production values or a lifeless, boring script.  But it's not good,
either.  Stigmata is a trashy, violent, witless movie, beset with a
deeply confused notion of the supernatural and a defiantly dumb ending.
It has a little, tiny bit of guilty-pleasure entertainment value, but
it's not worth passing by either Miller's Crossing or True Romance on
your video-rental shelves.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
"The question we need to ask: Is our children learning?"
    -- Governor George W. Bush

Author
Steve Rhodes
Having exhausted the possibilities of extreme violence as a way to shock
audiences, filmmakers are always looking for other methods to give the
viewers cheap thrills.  STIGMATA uses the Church, specifically the
Catholic Church, as a rich source of cheap exploitation.  Although other
films, most notably THE EXORCIST, have explored similar themes, most of
them are literary classics compared to STIGMATA.
As written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage and directed by Rupert
Wainwright, the movie tries every tired trick in the book.  Loud sounds
explode suddenly and often, like fireworks on the Fourth of July.
Filmed with harsh, rock-video sensibilities, the film features buckets
of blood, lit as if by the neon from a sleazy motel sign.  No idea is
too crass to be included.  The low point, in a movie full of nothing
but, is the stranger on the curb who drops her baby wrapped in swaddling
clothes under the tire of a speeding car in heavy traffic.
When we meet Father Andrew (Gabriel Byrne), he's on his way to work at
the Holy See.  Three gaudily dressed prostitutes shake their breasts at
him and offer to give him "the Vatican Special."
An organic chemist turned priest, who admits he hasn't prayed in a very
long time, Father Andrew works in the scientific investigation arm of
the Vatican.  This, in case you didn't know, is the one with all of the
sophisticated instruments to look into cases of religious miracles.
Father Andrew just finished verifying that a stone statue actually shed
warm, human tears.  He's told to forget it.  His superiors, led by a
nefarious, double-dealing Cardinal Vignielli (Jonathan Pryce), seem to
employ a host of researchers in order to hide what they discover.
The Vatican, it turns out, is more secure that our weapons' labs.
Documents are divided into threes with every third page given to a
different religious order to study.
Normally, Gabriel Byrne is able to bring a sweet, honest intensity to
his parts, but all his attempts this time to infuse his character with
at least a hint of humanity are utter failures.  To be fair, the
hackneyed material he has to work with makes the project impossible.
Frankie (Patricia Arquette), "an accredited cosmetologist," who lives in
a room with a thousand candles, is sent a gift by her mother.  Although
Frankie assumes it is a necklace, her mother has to set her straight.
"It's a crucifix, dear," she tells her daughter.
The picture cuts to Frankie in the bathtub.  After a dove flies
overhead, Frankie starts spurting blood in some of the places where
Jesus had nails driven into him on the cross.  She convulses violently
as if she were having sex with the devil.
Arquette displays all of the talent of someone taking Acting 101 at a
community college.  Between long, vacant looks, she bursts into brief
spasms of unbelievable, emotional tantrums.
Father Andrew is sent to look into Frankie's situation.  He explains how
extremely devout people, something she certainly isn't, sometimes have
been known to bleed in the places where Christ was cut.  These
spontaneous, unexplained events are known as stigmata.
Frankie is not a happy camper.  She blames the God she never knew for
causing all her misery, as she continues to feel nails being driven into
her hands and feet.  "You know what is scarier than not believing in
God?" she asks her girlfriend.  "Believing in him!"
The horror movie part is increasingly subsumed by a story about a vast
Vatican conspiracy to cover up the "missing Jesus Gospel."  Religious
leaders have people murdered so that the Church is not undermined.
Chief among these supposedly revolutionary and unknown thoughts of Jesus
are that "The kingdom of God is inside you and all around you."
Never coming close to achieving the level of laughably bad, the dry and
ludicrous STIGMATA never rises above painfully bad.  Search as one
might, there isn't a single interesting or original moment in it.
STIGMATA runs 1:42.  It is rated R for intense violent sequences,
language and some sexuality and would be acceptable for older teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Kevin Patterson
STIGMATA arrives in theaters amidst a certain amount of controversy 
over its negative portrayal of the Catholic Church's authority 
structure. Personally, I don't think it's worth anyone's effort to 
get offended over something as incoherent as this film, which amounts 
to little more than a two-hour music video. Some half-hearted 
attempts are made to tell a story about Vatican concealment of a 
previously unknown gospel, but most of it makes very little sense and 
is drowned out by the endless MTV-style cutting and the disruptively 
loud soundtrack. Viewers are more likely to come away questioning the 
screenplay's logic than questioning their religious beliefs.
The title refers to a condition reportedly experienced by various 
religious believers throughout history, in which the person 
mysteriously begins to exhibit the wounds inflicted on Christ before 
he died: nail puncture holes in the wrists and feet, lacerations from 
a whip and a crown of thorns, and spear wounds to the sides. STIGMATA 
begins by introducing us to Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a 
Catholic priest and a former scientist who investigates reports of 
miracles for the Church. He is sent to Pittsburgh when Frankie Paige 
(Patricia Arquette), a 23-year-old hair-stylist and, we learn, an 
atheist, begins to exhibit the stigmata. Andrew quickly realizes that 
this is probably legitimate, despite the fact that all previous 
stigmatics have been devout believers. She is taken to the hospital 
repeatedly for her injuries, supernatural events such as windows 
spontaneously breaking seem to follow her, she is hearing voices, and 
finally she channels an ancient Aramaic text and scrawls it on the 
wall of her apartment. Andrew's superior, Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan 
Pryce), however, is strangely disapproving and elusive, and 
eventually we learn why: the text that Frankie copied is a lost 
Gospel that Houseman fears could undermine the Church's authority, 
and he's willing to kill her to keep this discovery quiet.
If there's anything offensive to the Catholic Church here, it's that 
Andrew and Houseman both seem to be so ignorant about Catholicism. At 
the beginning, Andrew talks with his mentor in a Vatican library, who 
reveals that there are actually more supposed gospels in existence 
than the four in the Bible, and that mainstream Christianity simply 
hasn't accepted any of the others. This is very old news to anyone 
with even a passing acquaintance with Biblical scholarship, and to 
suggest that Andrew wouldn't already know this from his seminary 
training is impossible to swallow. The message contained in the lost 
Gospel that Houseman seeks to suppress is that the Kingdom of God is 
found everywhere, most importantly in the individual, and not just in 
"structures of stone and marble" (i.e. churches). Seeing as Jesus 
more or less said this in the four traditional Gospels, I can't 
fathom why Houseman would think it's dangerous. No Catholic priest 
would deny that the relationship between God and the individual 
supercedes the importance of an institution, and it isn't as if the 
text called for the believers to start tearing down churches. Perhaps 
the biggest howler is when Frankie worries that she will soon die 
because she will eventually receive the fifth wound of the stigmata 
-- the spear to the sides, which she calls "the one that killed him." 
Andrew appears to share her concern, but tries to reassure her by 
telling her that no one has ever received all five wounds of the 
stigmata. Evidently he skipped the parts of his training that 
required him to actually open the Bible, because otherwise he would 
know that Christ died from being crucified, not from being stabbed to 
death with a spear.
STIGMATA is filmed in a dimly lit, grainy style of cinematography: it 
seems to have been inspired more by BATMAN or DARK CITY than JESUS OF 
NAZARETH. Director Rupert Wainwright's hyperactive camera work is 
effective in capturing the hallucinatory power of Frankie's 
supernatural experiences, but it tends to distract in the other 
scenes, and characterization and plot get lost in the unnecessarily 
jumpy cutting and the brain-pounding music by Smashing Pumpkins 
songwriter Billy Corgan. There is only a superficial exploration of 
the relationship between Frankie and Andrew: much of it focuses on 
the relatively dull notion that he finds her sexually tempting, and 
their differences of belief are underdeveloped. Andrew is an 
interesting character in that he's found himself guided more by 
science than by faith, but this is unfortunately played out in scenes 
that seem to lack much internal logic. At one point, when Frankie is 
channeling, he says, "Who are you?" and the voice of a dead priest 
tells him, "The messenger is unimportant." Later, she is channeling 
this same dead priest, and when Andrew asks the spirit if he can be 
the new messenger, the spirit responds, "The messenger believes. You 
only have doubt." Now hang on a second: I thought the messenger was 
unimportant. And if belief is a necessity, why did the spirit choose 
an atheist as his medium?
The marketing campaign for STIGMATA has touted it as another entry in 
the recent wave of supernatural thrillers. It is, in fact, the 
supernatural sequences that are the most effective, since the 
disorienting music-video style is actually appropriate for these 
scenes. Wainwright uses a clever technique during the stigmata 
scenes, cutting back and forth between Frankie exhibiting the wounds 
and black-and-white flashbacks in which the hammer and nails and the 
whip are used on Christ. The scenes in which Frankie channels through 
a deep male voice are also pretty unnerving. I've been told that this 
was lifted from THE EXORCIST, which I haven't seen, but regardless of 
where the idea came from, it does work. Even these scenes, however, 
are marred by poor story logic and a tendency to go over the top. A 
sequence in which a hysterical Frankie runs out into the middle of 
the street and causes cars to swerve out of control and crash into 
each other borders on being unintentionally funny, and the film is 
never quite clear on who she is channeling and why. Most of the time, 
it seems to be the dead priest, but there is the hint of demonic 
possession at one point when she tries to seduce Andrew and then 
starts cursing at him and throwing him around the room. I was left 
wondering whether the filmmakers intended for us to think that she 
was channeling both the spirits of the deceased and demonic visitors, 
or if they thought for some reason that the spirit of a dead Catholic 
priest would behave like this. More to the point, I wonder if they 
even cared, given that they seem much more interested in flashy 
cutting and visual pyrotechnics than in probing the meaning behind 
the images they create.
There is a scene midway through the film which illustrates much of 
what is wrong with Stigmata. Andrew and Frankie are sitting in an 
outdoor café, discussing their respective lives as Andrew reflects on 
some of the sacrifices he's made to become a priest. Then their 
voices become inaudible, with saccharine music playing while we watch 
their lips move. Then the scene is interrupted by Frankie suddenly 
exhibiting the thorn wounds on her forehead and screaming 
hysterically. Riveting, certainly, but the opportunity for character 
development is wasted in favor of more showy camera work. STIGMATA is 
a film that would almost be better viewed with the sound turned off, 
so that the viewer could enjoy the flair and breakneck pacing of the 
visuals without worrying about the story possibilities that are being 
squandered along the way.
If this review comes off as unnecessarily harsh, that's probably 
because STIGMATA is the most frustrating kind of mediocre film: the 
kind that could have and should have been good. There are many routes 
that the filmmakers could have taken that would have resulted in a 
far superior product. The interaction between an atheist receving 
divine revelation and a priest plagued by doubt could have made for 
an intriguing character piece. Andrew's dilemma as a priest trying to 
balance his religious faith and his scientific skepticism would have 
been a worthy topic in today's world. Frankie's story actually 
carries some strong Biblical parallels, most notably that of the 
unbeliever chosen by God and the idea that divine service is equal 
parts reward and burden. The film refers to each of these issues, but 
it can't sit still long enough to explore any of them in any depth. 
Later on, it tries to switch into full-blown conspiracy thriller 
mode, but the notion of a cardinal trying to suppress a message 
that's already in the Bible is too ill-conceived for this to be even 
remotely convincing.
It has yet to be seen whether or not STIGMATA will inspire the same 
level of widespread protest as, say, The Last Temptation of Christ. 
Frankly, the screenplay's picture of the Church is so misinformed 
that nothing it has to say on the subject can be taken especially 
seriously. If you absolutely must protest this film, my advice would 
be to forget the half-hearted attempts at theology and complain about 
the overwrought visuals and the sloppy storytelling instead.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Author
Scott J. Promish
If nothing else, STIGMATA stands as the first Frank Mancuso, Jr. production
I've seen that wasn't just plain awful.  His previous record includes the
SPECIES films, BODY PARTS, COOL WORLD, and several FRIDAY THE 13TH sequels
which I haven't seen but could probably make an educated guess at.
This film at least has an air of quality about it: good actors (well,
Gabriel Byrne *was* also in COOL WORLD -- probably not something he's very
proud of), polished direction, and nothing in the script that caused me to
groan.  Its flaws only become apparent when you try to make sense of the
thing.
Hairdresser, clubrat and atheist Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette) is
relaxing in her bath when she is suddenly gripped by a violent attack.  She
is rushed to the hospital, gushing blood from wounds that go all the way
through her wrists.  After an later incident on a subway during which her
back is lashed by an unseen force, the church becomes involved and sends a
scientist-priest named Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne) to investigate the
phenomena.  The plot thickens when Father Kiernan discovers a conspiracy
involving the Catholic church and an ancient, lost scripture.
Like most stories whose premise revolves around religious phenomena,
STIGMATA falls apart under even the most casual examination.  It's hard to
discuss without spoiling the ending but I can say that what we finally learn
is the cause of Frankie's experiences does not explain them at all.  Why the
wounds, why the visions, why the violent outbursts?  Said ending is a
disappointment, and the `revelation' is a bit of gospel that even someone
with minimal knowledge of Christianity will find familiar, especially since
it is recited more than once previously in the course of the film.  The
conspiracy theme was handled much better -- albeit without the supernatural
element -- in THE NAME OF THE ROSE (1986).
The modern, techno soundtrack (composed by Smashing Pumpkin Billy Corgan and
which also features songs by Massive Attack, David Bowie and Afro Celt Sound
System) is an interesting contrast to a film in which one would expect to
hear symphonics.
It's a shame that a film that comes off so nicely otherwise is brought down
by careless storytelling.  In the end, STIGMATA is mildly enjoyable; just
take in the sights and sound and don't think about it.

Author
Michael Elliott
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Rupert Wainwright
STARRING:         Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia
Long
WRITTEN BY:       Tom Lazarus, Rick Ramage
RATED:            R for intense violent sequences, language, some sexuality
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Isaiah 52:14, Revelation 22:18-19, Proverbs 30:5-6
"A gift of God?  Can I give it back?"  It's a legitimate question that is
asked by Frankie Paige, a 23 year old hair stylist from Pittsburgh who
inexplicably develops an affliction allegedly only experienced by the
deeply religious.  The fact that she's an atheist is stumping the
religious investigators who have come to study her.  They've come because
her body is being assaulted by an invisible attacker, leaving on her the
marks of the stigmata.  "Why her?" is the question they want answered.
What does it mean?
STIGMATA, a new release from MGM, bears a passing resemblance to THE
EXORCIST, and is being released on the heels of THE SIXTH SENSE and STIR
OF ECHOES, two other supernatural thrillers.  Unlike its two recent
predecessors, STIGMATA focuses upon the depiction of religious phenomenon
and the response of the Roman Catholic Church in the face of such
unexplained events.  As such, it has the rare distinction of being
accurately inaccurate.
After receiving a rosary which belonged to a dead priest, Frankie
(Patricia Arquette, THE HI-LO COUNTRY) begins experiencing attacks from an
unseen force which causes deep wounds through her wrists and feet as well
as lacerations on her back and forehead... the same wounds experienced by
the crucified Jesus.  Such wounds are known in religious circles as
"stigmata."  Hearing of these attacks, the Vatican sends its emissary,
Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Bryne, THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK) to
investigate and prove or disprove the phenomenon.
As Father Kiernan becomes convinced of the spiritual nature of Frankie's
experiences, other factors begin to come to light which implicate the
Roman Catholic Church and its obsessive need for secrecy and
self-preservation at any cost.  Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce,
TOMORROW NEVER DIES), a high-ranking Vatican official takes a deep
interest in the ongoing investigation and when Frankie begins to speak and
write in Aramaic, the language of Christ, he comes to America and
ominously takes personal command of the situation.
The acting is first rate.  Patricia Arquette is amazing as a young night
clubbing party girl who has no way to understand or comprehend what is
happening to her.  She maintains her believability even in the midst of
unbelievable occurrences.  Gabriel Byrne is appropriately cast as a
scientist turned priest whose faith is tested and even potentially
strengthened by this experience.  Jonathan Pryce is downright
Machiavellian as the evil hearted Cardinal Houseman.
While the movie is both visually stunning and intense in nature, the
story it tells fails to adequately explain the various questions that it
brings to mind.  The concluding scenes, which unsatisfactorily resolves
the storyline, are disappointing on two levels:  From a narrative
perspective, the ending is implausible and only serves to raise a slew of
other questions.  From a spiritual perspective, it is misleading and in
many ways completely inaccurate.  It is impossible to go into more details
without revealing the ending but the scripture references I list at the
beginning of the review will allude to some of the untruths I find
objectionable.
The "gift of God" comment (which comes midway through the film) was a
lame attempt to explain why the stigmata is only experienced by the deeply
religious.  To believe that God would inflict such pain and suffering upon
anyone is beyond blasphemous.  It would contradict everything that God
reveals about Himself through His Word.
Jesus Christ endured the pain of the cross and the physical torture which
led to it (which was far worse than anything seen in the film... The
scriptures state that his body was ravaged so badly he was
unrecognizable.)  He did so for a specific purpose, the redemption and
salvation of all mankind.  To think that there is a godly reason for
anyone else to be subjected to that level of human suffering is to demean
and bring to naught his accomplishments.
Because of his accomplishments, we are able to claim physical wholeness,
manifest power from on high, understand spiritual matters, and lead a life
that is more than abundant.  That is the true gift of God in all its
beauty and divine glory.  Anything else, especially anything so obviously
devilish, is counterfeit.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
Cranky CriticŽ Reviews: Stigmata
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce
Screenplay by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage
Directed by Rupert Wainwright
website: www.mgm.com/stigmata
IN SHORT: A great commercial for a non-scary flick.
If you were fascinated by the Stigmata television commercial, try to
imagine watching 60 straight minutes of it. That editing overkill is
what stops Stigmata dead in its tracks as a movie. If it were a
mathematical formula, Stigmata would = (Blade - vampires) + (The
Exorcist - pea soup and obscenity) / story. Drawing heavily from
Christian mysticism and attacking the inner political construction of
the Roman Catholic church, Stigmata spends more time allowing director
Rupert Wainwright to show off his photographic knowledge and editing
chops than it does on the story. Cranky was ready to yell at the screen
"Hey! It's story time already" when just enough intrigue dribbled out to
keep his attention focussed for a few more minutes. Unfortunately it was
way too little, far too late.
Stigmata features a lot of effects -- levitation, blood, fire -- and
one, true mystery: how is it that the wounds of Christ manifest
themselves on the body of a cute blonde resident of Pittsburgh, PA? The
Vatican has a special section, the Special Congregation for the Causes
of Saints -- whose job it is to investigate religious mysteries and its
Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce) dispatches Father Andrew Kiernan
(Gabriel Byrne) to investigate.  This is the second investigation
Kiernan does in this movie, the first involving a South American statue
of the Virgin Mary that weeps tears of human blood. There's a tenuous
link between the two, but I'll leave that for you to discover.
When Kiernan finds the lovely Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), his
investigation ends almost as quickly as it begin, for Frankie is not a
member of the True Church. That means she, and her wounds, is of no
interest to his section. But Frankie speaks in tongues -- turns out to
be the kind of Aramaic spoken 2000 years ago in Galilee -- and has
scribbled strange characters on the walls of her loft. They, too, are
Aramaic, and the words therein are part of a hidden document that could
shake the theosophical nature of the Vatican to its core.
Stigmata features a gorgeous first hour of photographic effects and
heavy duty editing over a soundtrack of techno-heavy metal music. for
purposes of this film, it is constantly raining in Pittsburgh, which
means lots of slow motion shots of water dripping and plopping. The
Catholic Church being loaded with symbols and icons, this film also goes
heavy on symbolic things whose meaning is quite beyond the knowledge of
this Member of the Tribe. What I do know is that Stigmata is based on
two fragments (part of phrase 3 and the latter half of phrase 77) of the
Dead Sea Scroll called The Gospel of Thomas, which this film has used to
create a "new" text that is even more heretical than the "Thomas".
Anyone that has studied the Dead Sea Scrolls (Cranky pleads guilty) can
tell you that there are lots of tempting heretical bits and pieces that
would fascinate anyone that has even a mild knowledge of Christianity.
Stigmata drowns any interesting mystery in so much visual nonsense that
it defeats the purpose of any movie, to tell a good and interesting
story. There is a story here, but it's buried way too deep. And, of
course, time is wasted while the priest is tempted by the blonde . Been
there, done that.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Stigmata, he would have paid...
Rental level. Oh, yeah. The Gospel of Thomas is attributed to Didymos
Judas Thomas, founder of the Eastern Church and Twin Brother of Jesus.
Told ya it was a good bit of heretical bit info. Theoretically, the
Gospel of Mary is even worse, 'cuz it strips the Vatican of any
authority as guardian and sole arbiter of the Word. But that's a story
for a different movie.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Cast: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Rade 
Sherbedgia, Portia De Rossi, Jack Donner.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 11, 1999.
Not knowing any better, I would have guessed that "Stigmata," the new 
religious-themed possession tale, is just a fancy name for "Exorcist IV," and 
I may be right. Let's look at the evidence: a young woman possessed; a priest 
struggling with his own beliefs and feelings; mysteriously-inflicted slash 
marks; a climactic possession sequence; and pea soup. Well, okay, pea soup 
maybe be an exaggeration, but it might as well have been included, for, as 
directed by Rupert Wainwright, the film's only major differences to the 
classic 1973 horror film, "The Exorcist," are a quick-cut style for those 
whose attention span has been depleted by MTV, and a disappointing lack of 
any believable human story. On second thought, perhaps "Stigmata" is actually 
"Beyond the Door IV," in disguise.
In a prologue set in a dusty, Catholic region of Brazil, an American woman 
purchases a rosary that once belonged to Father Paulo Alameida (Jack Donner), 
who is now lying in a coffin in a nearby church, the statue of Mary beside 
him bleeding human blood from its eyes. Switch to the city of Pittsburgh, 
23-year-old Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a talented beautician who, at 
night, likes to go club (and man)-hopping with her best friend (Nia Long), 
receives a gift from her mother that has arrived at her front door. Among the 
small presents is the rosary she bought in Brazil, and soon after, Frankie is 
attacked in her bath tub by an unknown force that causes her wrists to bleed 
straight through, as if large pegs had been nailed into her. At the hospital, 
the wounds are suspected to be self-inflicted, despite Frankie's argument 
that she loves herself and has no stress ("I cut hair!"). Before long, she 
also is tortured with slash marks across her body while on an out-of-control 
subway cart, thorn cuts on her face, and occasionally is being possessed and 
forced to recite the Aramaic language, which hasn't been used in thousands of 
years. Enter Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a part priest/part 
scientist from the Vatican, who travels to Pittsburgh to try and help 
Frankie. His guess is that she has the curse of the stigmata, the inflicted 
wounds of christ, and since she has had four of the five major wounds, she is 
in grave danger of dying if it occurs again. There's just one catch: 
Stigmatics are always highly religious individuals, while Frankie is an 
atheist who is quickly starting to believe in otherwordly forces.
"Stigmata" is a relentless and thoroughly unpleasant horror film that is so 
fast-paced and stylized, with loud alternative music and quick cuts popping 
up at every chance it gets, that the whole experience of watching it 
gradually became an ordeal. In one scene after the next, we watch Frankie 
being graphically mutilated by something we cannot see, and while it 
sometimes is powerful and unsettling, that mostly results from all of the 
bloodletting. In between, there are painfully few exposition scenes in which 
we get to know the characters because, every time some dialogue enters in, 
Frankie abruptly is pierced through her feet or various other body parts. A 
major flaw this is, because in order to care about this woman who is in a 
dire situation in which any moment could be her last, we have to be able to 
sympathize with her plight. According to screenwriters Tom Lazarus and Rick 
Ramage, their idea of satisfying character development is showing Frankie 
smoking and drinking at clubs, and then bringing men home with her. Patricia 
Arquette, who, at 31, admittedly looks a little long in the tooth to be 
playing a 23-year-old, tries her best in an unlikable role that helps none in 
displaying her considerable, but usually wasted, acting chops. 
Gabriel Byrne fares better, as a priest who is dedicated to his profession, 
but not enough to turn away from a romantic subplot that forms between 
Frankie and himself. And why the heck not? Byrne may very well be one of the 
better-looking priest characters in any movie I've seen (certainly more so 
than the various Fathers in "The Exorcist"), and aside from this casting 
flaw, he really is a strong presence in his more challenging moments 
on-screen.
At times, the repititious violence that fills the screen throughout grows 
overly tedious (I mean, how many near-fatal wounds can a normal person get 
without dying?), and the supporting characters may have helped break up the 
grisliness of the proceedings. They, too, are severely wasted, particularly 
Nia Long (a fine actress in her own right), who is stuck playing the 
"concerned friend" character. Unlike most, though, the film doesn't even 
follow through with her, as she disappears midway through and is never seen 
again.
As "Stigmata" plays out its bag of tricks, continuously growing more and more 
ludicrous with each passing moment until it completely collapses in its 
fire-and-brimstone climactic exorcism, one is led to wonder exactly how 
anyone would like the film. The story developments and character interactions 
are especially unrewarding, particularly the ending, which is supposed to be 
a greatly touching moment, but only comes off as cornball. The film 
ultimately leaves a bitter taste in your mouth, mostly from its lack of 
emotion, and comes off feeling overblown rather than the least bit scary. I 
think I've changed my mind about "Stigmata" being the third sequel in the 
famous possession series; on second thought, it's more akin to "Exorcist II: 
The Heretic."
 - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    NZone Magazine

Author
Jerry Saravia
It is a pleasure to see the horror genre back again with a keen interest in the
supernatural, eschewing any of the tired slasher routines since "Scream's"
wake. It is less pleasurable to see that filmmakers can become so misguided as
to make complete drivel like "Stigmata," a poorly conceived, beautifully shot
yet pointless rip-off of "The Exorcist." 
Patricia Arquette stars as Frankie Paige, a Pittsburgh hairdresser who
frequents clubs with her pals (she also has an unseen boyfriend who no doubt
finds her to be as irritating as I did). One day, she receives a rosary from
her mother in the mail, and suddenly finds thick nail wounds on her wrists
while taking a bath. Frankie goes to the emergency room but feels no pain, and
the doctors unbelievably feel the wounds were self-inflicted. Oh, please. I
don't think anyone would have the strength to drive thick nails through their
wrists. Nevertheless, Frankie seems undaunted by all this and still goes
club-hopping. Unfortunately, her customers want someone else to cut their hair
(understandable, I mean, would you want someone with bandages around their
wrists to cut your hair?). Frankie starts to see visions, such as a woman
dropping a baby on a street corner. She also suffers more wounds, like being
relentlessly whipped in a out-of-control subway car. 
The truth is that she is afflicted with stigmata, the supposed wounds that
Christ suffered during the crucifixion. So, yes, there are the whippings,
thorns penetrating her skull, nails driven through her wrists and feet, and so
on. But nothing seems to faze Frankie, she just becomes annoyed that such an
affliction would get in the way of her nightlife and sex life. Another truth
glossed over is that stigmatics are usually Catholic, but in Frankie's case,
she is atheist. But this rosary apparently came from a Brazilian priest who
passed the stigmata to the next available customer (Question: how come
Frankie's mother did not get it first?)
The Vatican (almost all of its members photographed in deep shadows) discovers
this particular stigmatic, and decide to employ Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel
Byrne), a scientist who determines the veracity of miracles around the world,
to investigate this woman and see if she is indeed a spiritual manifestation of
the Holy Ghost. Kiernan finds that she is, but he is also a man grappling with
his own faith (read Jason Miller's Father Karras in "Exorcist"). I was curious
about a scene where he almost decides not to pursue the case once Frankie
admits to being atheist. Of course, why any of these spiritual happenings would
affect an atheist is a question never posed by anyone in the entire movie.
Instead, we get intimate scenes between the girl and the priest, some moments
of brief possession, and a laughable fiery exorcism sequence that lifts whole
sections of dialogue from "The Exorcist." What any of this has to with stigmata
is beyond me.
"Stigmata" has certain ambitions to be either a spiritually cleansing exercise
or a psychological portrait of a self-destructive young woman grappling with
her spiritual beliefs. Instead, director Rupert Wainwright depicts Frankie's
life-changing event as if it were an inconvenience. Also, we get alot of talk
about how deeply painful it is to be stigmatic because there are so many
repercussions from different spirits, both good and evil. But Frankie is an
unchanged woman from beginning to end - a cipher with no inner life. She never
seems affected or truly afflicted, despite the numerous special-effects and
mili-second cuts of drops of water and horrid images of bleeding wounds. Those
are all devices constructed as if we were watching an MTV film with music by
Nine Inch Nails, and they detract from the character and the story. 
"Stigmata" has caused a haelstorm of controversy because it is seemingly
anti-Catholic. As written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage, the film is not good
enough to provoke any such argument. The only committed heresy is how much of
it is borrowed from "The Exorcist." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Author
John Sylva
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe/MoviePED.html
Rupert Wainwright brings us Stigmata, a high powered, clever thrill ride that
stands as one of the most intriguing and spellbinding films I've ever seen. 
Stigmata's depthful plot revolves around Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a
23 year old, Atheist hipster, whom after receiving Rosary Beads that belonged
to a now deceased priest from her mother in Brazil, is inflicted with the
wounds of Christ, a.k.a. the stigmata.  From there, Frankie's life goes
downward, as the wounds become more violent and serious, and her body becomes
possessed by the unknown.  The Vatican sends Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel
Byrne) to investigate the matter, and when he sees the case he has on his
hands, he is forced to question his own faith, as Frankie is going through
something a little more serious than a flu bug.
Stigmata's cleverness is only somewhat derived from films such as "The Exoricst
" or "The Omen", as Stigmata's alternate world is something so original and
haunting, the film itself will stand as a representation of 90's horror films. 
The film shows slight signs of inspiration from "The Exoricst", mainly during
the multiple episodes that Frankie is involved with, but there are enough
twists to tell the two films apart.  
By the time Stigmata reaches its 100 minute conclusion, you feel exhausted,
from all the thinking your mind does while viewing this mesmerizing piece of
art, yet at the same time you're uneasy, as you may question organized religion
altogether, and wonder why so many people gather at church every Sunday. 
Stigmata's religious themes are so strong and convincing, and the message from
the film is so inspirational, and true, some may question their own religious
practices.  Stigmata will have the Catholic Church complaining for years to
come, as they are more or less made fools of here.  Although some believe this
element of Stigmata is offensive and mean spirited, I believe the writers of
Stigmata are only expressing their opinions, and expressing them through film. 
Just because one doesn't agree with the message in Stigmata, shouldn't mean the
film is a bad one.  And for those of you who believe Stigmata is mean spirited,
look at comedies such as Drop Dead Gorgeous, in which girls kill each other to
win a beauty pageant, or South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut, in which
numerous ethnic groups are made fun of. 
The performances aren't anywhere close to brilliant, as there is no stand out,
or any performance that I could actually call great, but the entire cast gives
decent performances.  Patricia Arquette is terribly monotone in her role,
delivers most of her dialogue with no feeling or emotion, and comes close to
believability at times, but only convinces you half way.  Luckily, everything
else in the film, aside from the acting, is up to and above par, which takes
some of the restraint off of her rather weak performance.  Arquette's
performance is the only deciding factor between an A film and an A- film, as
for her character of Frankie to completely work, you need an actress capable of
convincing an audience of her upset and troubles, which Arquette doesn't do.  
Arquette's character reminds me most of Anette Bening's in last winter's clever
thriller, In Dreams, in which a woman was stalked by a serial killer in her
dreams, as both characters are clueless as to what is going on, both are
accused of being psychotic, and both are given some over the top dialogue which
they have to try extremely hard to say them, and have them come across as
realistic.  A veteran actress like Bening, who perfected her character in In
Dreams, could work better in Frankie's role, as while Arquette only delivers
two masterfully acted scenes, Bening masterfully acted an entire film.
The screenplay, written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage does have a few holes
and flaws here and there, but the main religious themes are overwhelmingly
powerful, and the holes are ones that don't particularly stand out after
watching the film.  The main problem with the script is the way it romantically
links Frankie and Father Kiernan, as it tries to develop a relationship between
two characters who have nothing in common, have a large age gap, and one is
being possessed by unknown forces.  The relationship is unconvincing, yet it
does add some respect for Byrne's character throughout the film, as many
characters would have ditched Frankie and let them handle their own problems.
The cinematography seems to be a touch of Heaven, with bright colors
glistening, color and camera angles always perfect, and characters always
glistening with a sparkly touch.  The cinematographic style seems like
something out of a music video, which many think is a negative thing, but
watching the beautiful sites Stigmata brings for around two hours is just fine
with me. 
Stigmata stands as the eeriest film of the year to date, as it easily
out-creeps August's The Sixth Sense, or July's The Blair Witch Project.  The
atmospheric and pulse pounding style contributes many scares, but the big
scares occur while Frankie goes through her "episodes", where things get a
little out of hand, to say the least.  The direction by Rupert Wainwright is
nothing short of brilliant, while he always keeps the interest level up, the
soundtrack booming, and the scares coming.  I commend Wainwright mainly for his
portrayal of how the stigmata are imprinted on Frankie, using graphically
realistic flash images of nails being driven into her hands, feet, and well,
you get the picture.
The Bottom Line- Stigmata bursts with cleverness, chills, and strong,
convincing religious themes, all combining to create a spellbinding, thought
provoking, unforgettable motion picture.

Author
Eugene Novikov
 Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce. Rated R.
The influence of the MTV generation on cinema has never been more
apparent than in Stigmata, a visually stunning, prepostrously plotted
thriller that also happens to be vehemently anti-Catholic. MGM will
never hear the end of it from the ubiquitous, uncomfortably large
Catholic League, and understandably so; unlike some of the films that
activist groups have made a fuss about, it's not hard to see where this
one may offend. Let the offended ones balk, but this is tremendously
enjoyable trash, an audaciously stylized full-length music video that
manages to deliver a smart, surprisingly restrained message in a story
that doesn't make an iota of sense.
Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a spunky Pittsburg hairdresser who is
also an atheist, comes home after a night on the town. She's tired. A
nice, warm bath seems like a tantalizingly good idea, so she decides to
take one. As she submerges herself in the water, something happens. Her
body thrashes in the tub, as if under the will of an invisible attacker.
Next thing she knows, she is in the hospital. There are identical
puncture wounds on both of her wrists. They go all the way through,
piercing both flesh and bone. The doctor reasonably assumes, considering
the nature of the injuries and the circumstances under which they were
incurred, that she mutilated herself in an apparent suicide attempts.
Frankie denies it, claiming that she loves her life and would not even
think about ending it.
A couple of days pass. Frankie and her pal (Nia Long) are on a subway
train. Something happens. The lights go out and the car shakes. Frankie
moves into the middle, her arms outstretched and holding on to the
overhead compartments. She receives numerous whippings on her back,
again coming from a seemingly invisible attacker. Is it a coincidence
that a group of nuns and priests were in the same car with her? What is
happening to this innocent woman?
These events are brought to the attention of the Roman Catholic Church,
which sends Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne, who, ironically, will
be playing Satan in the upcoming End of Days), a
priest/scientist/gumshoe to investigate. The suspicion, of course, is
that Frankie is a stigmatic, one of the very rare people afflicted with
the wounds of Christ. But stigmatics are invariably deeply faithful
people, and Frankie being an atheist presents a fundamental
contradiction. This is so unheard of, in fact, that Kiernan is ready to
dismiss the case, that is until Frankie, angry, confused and vulnerable,
convinces him to probe further. In doing so, he finds himself
questioning his own loyalties.
I can't go into too much detail without revealing some of the plot's
secrets, but to accept Stigmata's story is to accept the fact that God
would be willing to cause severe injury to people in order to get his
point across. Considering this film's devoutly religious message, that
is ludicrous. The thought mires down the movie at every turn, since we
are constantly depended on to accept it.
I never believed the film for a second, but I was delighted with the way
young director Rupert Wainwright (um, Blank Check, anyone?) brought it
to life. He will take flack for employing the "MTV style" of filmmaking
(some have unfairly labeled it "attention deficit disorder filmmaking),
but I defend his choice. The rapid, stylish, somewhat hyperactive way
Stigmata was filmed, along with its booming, spontaneous soundtrack, not
only makes the film more palatable but it also diverts our attention
somewhat from the movie's inconsistencies and makes it easier to watch.
Give Rupert Wainwright a good script, I say, and we may have our next
Brian DePalma.
Patricia Arquette gives an astonishingly good performance as the
physically and emotionally battered Frankie. At times, her grief is
devastatingly palpable. Gabriel Byrne reminded me a bit too much of
Jason Miller's Damien Karras in The Exorcist, but I suppose that was not
fully unintentional. Actually, Stigmata is less similar to the William
Peter Blatty classic than many have claimed. It isn't nearly as scary --
or as good -- but it is more thoughtful and less patently devilish.
Stigmata has a good cast, wonderful style and some effective filmmaking
all undermined by the implausibility of its story. It's an intelligent
movie and it is a well-made one; if only I could believe it.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov

Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   One church group has already protested "Stigmata,"
insuring that while the movie may not topple the invincible
"Sixth Sense" from box-office domination, Rupert
Wainwright's film will attract a larger audience than it
deserves.  Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage's script indicates
that since Jesus proclaimed in his sermons that "the kingdom
of God is within you," he implicitly warned against the building
of stone and marble edifices (read: beautiful, expensive
churches) to glorify his word.  While this motif is supposed to
make "Stigmata" subversive, kids have learned this fact of
spiritual life virtually on their first day in Sunday school--or so
I hear from Ed Johnson-Ott, my distinguished online
colleague in Indianapolis.  Since the Gospel according to
Luke has long accommodated this precept, the notion is
nothing new and certainly no cardinal, however reactionary,
would think of killing a woman who is involuntarily bearing
this message to the citizens of Pittsburgh.
   "Stigmata" is done up flagrantly in MTV style, given its
frequent flurries of blood-soaked vistas jolted to dramatic life
by a soundtrack contributed by Smashing Pumpkins singer
Billy Corgan's version of the Vatican rag.  The music is at
least an improvement over the usual Carmina Burana cliche
so often trotted out when melodramatic religiosity is required. 
Director Wainwright, expecting a fidgety audience unwilling or
unable to meditate upon one location or plot for too long,
switches his scenes sporadically from a Brazilian village to
the Vatican to New York City to Pittsburgh in a merry-go-
roundelay of geographical panoramas and cultures.  His
characters speak English, Aramaic, Italian and Portuguese as
they wind their way through a series of plots and subplots
involving a cardinal who thinks he's the Pittsburgh strangler,
a priest who thinks he's a scientist, and a manicurist who has
acquired the skill of having nails cut her.
   Father Kiernan is under Vatican assignments with the
thankless job of proving that miracles just don't happen any
more--not on 34th Street, not in Milan and certainly not on
Main Street, in the wilderness or in the rain.  When he visits
a church in a Brazilian village which has reported a statue
crying bloody tears, he furiously takes pictures with his Nikon
like a frocked Faye Dunaway but is prevented from wrapping
the statue and shipping it for lab analysis to his eerie boss,
Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce), in the Vatican.  But
this does not stop the rich, bourgeois mother of Frankie
Paige from shipping rosary beads--stolen from a dead priest
lying in state next to the statue--to her daughter in Pittsburgh,
after which Frankie begins to bleed in the same areas of her
body from which the wounded Jesus bled on the cross--the
stigmata of the movie's title.  Suffering epileptic-type seizures
in several incidents while bleeding from the wrist, feet and
head, she baffles the doctors who believe the wounds are
self-inflicted and upsets her best friend, Donna (Nia Long),
who runs after her like a mother hen each time she is
overcome.  Father Kiernan takes on the task of finding out
the truth behind the affronts to Frankie's body.
   The most intriguing feature of the story is the sexual
gamesmanship between a priest of matinee-idol looks, Father
Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne) and the 23-year-old
manicurist, Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette) who hits on him,
having us in the audience place bets on whether she can nail
him before she gets overly nailed herself.  
   As the Smashing Pumpkins-inspired soundtrack is pumped
up now and then, Hitchcockian birds fly about, undulating first
in the Brazilian church, later in Frankie's capacious
apartment, summoning thoughts of the 13th century St.
Francis of Assisi who was said to lose a pint of blood a day
when that great friend of animals himself suffered from the
stigmata.  The scenes featured prominently in the movie's
trailer--a man's ominous voice originating from the body of
this clueless manicurist who suddenly graffities her walls with
fluent Aramaic--are reminiscent of Linda Blair's outcries in the
daddy of the genre, "The Exorcist," and by now are anything
but scary.  
   Lack of credibility is the least of the movie's problems. 
Over-the-top imagery, music, and rapid-fire editing are the
culprits that stigmatize the story, one which, like "The
Haunting," is too overwrought to scare anyone  or to
intimidate any devoutly religious folks concerned about the
film's allegedly subversive strain.  Gabriel Byrne is
wonderfully cast as the handsome priest who, despite his
meetings with the seductive (but in my view unappealing)
Patricia Arquette nonetheless convinces us that he is fighting
his own demons, while Ms. Arquette tries unavailingly to
show that a beautician can be as captivating as Warren
Beatty.

Author
Jon Ridge
     I missed a 1 ošclock for łStir of Echoes˛ by six minutes
and, not being one to miss a second of the movie-going
experience -- Išm talking lights dimming, previews, even that
THX thing with the cows (mšI psycho, or what) -- I caught a 1:15
of this film, instead.  Mistake.
Produced with an MTV-eye, łStigmata˛ is all photography
direction.  The story, next to impossible to concentrate on one
second to the next because the filmšs visual style is so abrasive,
follows Atheist hairdresser Frankie Page (Patricia Arquette) as
she becomes łafflicted˛ with the titular phenomena.  Meaning, wounds
of Christ; receive five, and you die.  So, the film is more or less
a countdown to her death.  Well.. why is this happening?  As a
form of extreme punishment on a non-believer, or a method of _making_
them believe?  Dunno.  Either way, thatšs not entertaining, itšs
depressing.  We get loving shots of large nails being hammered into
feet and hands, over and over again;  divine imagery, right?  If it
isnšt Arquette getting slashed or impaled, itšs blood dripping into
water, water dripping into water (Frankiešs apartment has a
convenient leak), or rain -- everything in annoying close-up.  Tip:
try to make everything look cool (microwaves, candles, coffee
cups, more candles.. did I mention water), and nothing does.
As for the gore, I wonder how a movie like this one skirts
the NC-17 rating.  One scene, featuring an open wound on Arquettešs
wrist that gushes blood so profusely for, like, five seconds, or
thereabouts, made me nauseous.  That, plus images of carnage
scattered throughout at what seemed like two-minute intervals;
wherešs the line?  A minutešs worth of sex in greater cinema like
łEyes Wide Shut˛ is too obscene for mass audiences, but 100
minutes of bloodshed here isnšt?  Oy... the hypocrisy continues.
If anything, I enjoyed Gabriel Byrnešs performance as the
priest/scientist/whatever the hell hešs supposed to be.  Hešs got
a couple reaction takes, off the possessed Frankie, that felt
natural.  Of course, then they get all doe-eyed toward one another,
and flirty, and talk about how he misses sex, and drink beer:  how
is there time for this?  Hešs supposed to be a man of the cloth,
what would she see in a -- nevermind.

Author
Indra Moeljadi
Stigmata: wounds similar to Jesus' wounds when he was crucified.
This movie is based on a real thing, and with something that happens in
reality among very religious people. If you know all that, then this movie
is pretty scary, because it shows the Stigmata, and it also tells about the
missing document of the church.
Frankie Page (Patricia Arquette) is a regular girl living in Pennsylvania.
She works and goes out and she doesn't believe in God. One day she gets an
rosary from her mother and then all the fun begins. Father Andrew Kiernan
(Gabriel Byrne) works at the Vatican as a scientist. So he was sent to see
what's happening to Frankie Page.
The setting is very dark and wet (it rains almost all the time in
Pennsylvania), and Frankie's being possessed by another Father is portrayed
as if it is a horror movie. Andrew Kiernan is more of a scientist than a
religious man, and the Cardinal looks like a mafia godfather, when in fact
he is one of the highest order in Catholic church. And most of all, the
movie lacks climax. The climax point was very obvious and it has a lower
intensity compared to other scenes.
This movie could have been a great movie, giving that ir was based on a true
story, with facts that happens, but the whole portrayal of it is just too
Hollywood, too unreligious. I'm not complaining that this movie offends or
misinterprets some religions, but if you're going to make a movie about
certain aspects of a religion, it is better to know the religion first.

Author
James Brundage
Written by Tom Lazurus and Rick Ramage
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, and Jonathan Pryce
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 I've got a thing about horror movies I hate 'em.  Almost every horror film
put in front of me comes off with a review filled with complete disgust at
its plotless nature and its annoying dialogue.  Even more than horror films,
however, I hate movies about the end of the world.  Imagine my surprise when
Stigmata was neither.
 Although horror is the closest place to put Stigmata, it actually lies in
the category of religious drama.  Thankfully, the film has nothing to do
with the end of the world.  What it has to do with is the end of the
Catholic Church via a gospel according to Christ that is delivered in the
form of a possessed Frankie Paige (Arquette).
 It has all of the elements required of a film to appeal to the mainstream:
suspense,  a cool soundtrack, a good-looking actress and an actor that your
date will think is sweet because of the Irish accent.  Yet something lurks
beyond this.  Something is hidden in the folds of what appears on the
surface to be a complete idiocy of a mainstream film.
 The film features, although laying it on thick at numerous times, an
anti-Catholic church political agenda.  It spends half of its time scaring
most of us with a mystery and a few Exorcist rip offs, and the rest of the
time involving us with a conspiracy concerning the covering up of the Christ
Gospel (as the movie calls it).
 Luckily, the people to whom which this will hit too close to home will
probably not be found in a movie theatre for a film already declared a
sacrilege.  As many Lenny Bruce-esque jokes as I could prattle off in the
next few paragraphs, I will refrain from doing so for the fact that, at
least in this case, I do not want to offend anyone.
 The film has an incredibly dark and stylish feel to it, befitting of the
better half of MTV directors who made the transition to film.  A sad
offshoot of this industrial feel is that they felt the need to pick
Pittsburgh as their locale -- a city which no rickety subways that is in
general about as dark as Mickey Mouse (although, to its credit, it is highly
industrial).  Glossy effects are used, but not overused.  A techno
soundtrack and a heavy percussion score marks the film's suspenseful half
while allowing just enough time for our brains to contemplate what is
happening.
 One of the things that is scary as a society came in an ad-libbed review a
friend gave me of The Blair Witch Project: "It made you think, and that was
scary."  Although this was highly ambiguous as to whether the fact that you
thought during a horror film was scary or the thoughts you were having were
scary, Stigmata barks up the same tree.  It makes you think.  The thoughts
you think are downright terrifying, the distrusts in Catholicism are as vast
and as paranoid as anything Chris Carter thought up for "The X-Files."  At
the same time, however, Stigmata leaves you in such a way as to examine the
role of God and faith and the church in life, a subject too many of us spend
too little time thinking on.
 With this final couplet I end my review,
 It's sad when Hollywood's more pious than you.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

STIGMATA (director:Rupert Wainwright; screenplay:Tom Lazarus/Rick
Ramage; cinematographer: Jeffrey L. Kimball; cast: Patricia Arquette
(Frankie Paige), Gabriel Byrne (Father Andrew Kiernan), Jonathan Pryce
(Cardinal Houseman), Nia Long (Donna, Frankie's best friend), Patrick
Muldoon (Steven), Portia de Rossi (Jennifer), Rade Serbedzija ( priest),
Jack Donner (Father Paulo Alameida), 1999)
Who has the right to investigate the Catholic Church on matters of
religion? The implicit answer given by the filmmaker, is that the
kingdom of God is within you, not in beautiful and expensive churches to
glorify his word. Therefore it is one's own responsibility to find the
truth. Now that doesn't sound too radical, or does it? The filmmaker
makes the claim that the closest we can get to the actual Aramaic words
of Jesus comes from the missing Gospel of Thomas discovered in the Dead
Sea Scrolls. Nevertheless, the church has not recognized that work and
in 1945 declared the work to be a heresy. That is the filmmaker's
version, but he's mistaken, it was not declared heretical: upon further
research I discovered that the church only said it was simply
non-canonical. As for it being unattainable and suppressed by the
church, that's hogwash, I've owned a copy of it since the 1970s and
anyone can order it in a bookstore.
The real aim of the film, thusly, becomes one of showing the power
struggle between the faithful followers of the canonical and those who
oppose them by following the apocryphal, as the word of God. The
in-fighting within the church has always been of a political nature and
it should not be that surprising that the establishment of the church
wishes to preserve its power base and continue to set the standards for
its rituals, miracles, and what is to be the true Catholic religion.
That the film doesn't always stick to its aim and gets mired down in
unnecessary subplots, is what disappointed me most about this story that
could have been... well, great! That is, if it were in the hands of a
filmmaker who was more accurate in his details.
The film uses the supernatural as its storyline. Stigmata are bleedings
from the same five wounds received by the crucified Jesus: nails through
the wrists and feet, lashes on the back, scratches on the scalp from the
crown of thorns, and a spear through the side. That it is only those
deeply devoted to Jesus Christ and God who receive this gift, presents a
problem to the church when it happens to an atheist in the film- which
makes the story controversial with the church. St. Francis of Assissi,
in the 13th century, was the first to have received these "so called"
gifts of God.
Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), who is a trained scientist
investigates and mostly disproves miracles, working for the Vatican's
"Sacred Congregation for the Causes of Saints." He is sent by his boss,
Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce), (which is an appropriate name for
him, because his whole purpose in life is to maintain the right of the
church at any cost of the truth), to investigate a miracle taking place
in a small Brazilian church. As a scientist he can't find anything phony
about the blood tear drops coming out of the Virgin Mary statue, and his
report to Cardinal Houseman that this miracle might be authentic, is met
with displeasure by him.
Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), is a 23-year-old Pittsburgh
hairdresser who is an avowed partygoer and a confessed atheist and who
has the misfortune of receiving a gift from her vacationing mother of a
rosary bead that was stolen from the dead priest (Father Alameida) of
the Brazilian miracle church. Father Alameida (Donner) is a translator
of the forbidden Thomas Gospel, the one that could supposedly topple the
foundation of the Catholic Church.
Within hours of touching the rosary beads, Frankie is in the hospital
with a deep puncture
wound in each wrist - the first of the five stigmata she will endure for
the length of the film. The hospital thinks she is suicidal and that the
wounds are self-inflicted. She receives the second stigmata, lacerations
on her back with the lashes of a whip, while on a subway train, that is
witnessed by a priest, who contacts Rome sending them the security video
taken from the train. The hospital this time is checking her for
epilepsy. But Cardinal Houseman when he hears about this case, assigns
Father Kiernan to squelch any talk of the stigmata that the press has
reported. The story will now begin to focus on the relationship of the
two doubters, Frankie and Father Kiernan, as they both have a chance to
re-evaluate what their faith is because of these incidents. It has also
become apparent that Frankie has become the messenger for the holy
Father Alameida and when possessed speaks in the ancient Aramaic tongue,
spilling out the Thomas Gospel she doesn't even know exists and writing
it on the wall of her apartment.
The filmmaker shows that anything about the church can be argued away by
them. For instance, when Frankie tells Father Kiernan that she can't
have the stigmata because she is bleeding from her wrists and on all the
church statues the blood is coming from the palms of the hand. He
responds, by telling her the artists interpreted it that way, not
realizing that the Crucifixion couldn't support the weight of a body on
the hands. This very revealing statement of how inaccurate all the
Christian icons are magnifies the point the filmmaker is making, that
even the eyewitnesses to the event all saw things their own way and to
dogmatize them without questioning them, makes for a very questionable
religion.
Director Wainright tries hard to make Stigmata to be an unconventional
film, with a "hip" musical score (Smashing Pumpkins) and a mod style of
camera shots and montages. By using many different fanciful camera
angles, he allows you to feel the pain of the Crucifixion while we see
nails driven into Frankie's wrists. There are many other disturbing
images, such as broken glass moved by a spiritual wind, doves appearing
out of nowhere, ominous bird feathers, and dripping blood, which add,
unfortunately, to the incredibility of the story. During the sequences
in which Frankie receives her wounds, there are a number of quick cuts
between her body in agony and a crucified male, and many slow motion
shots emphasizing the agony over and over again. The dazzling
cinematography even makes the rainy weather and bad traffic jams of
Pittsburgh look like an inferno, while it switches gears and goes to the
contrasting opulence of the Vatican and the poverty of the Brazil
village, where the faithful flock to the miracle church.
Though there are many films (Exorcist, Rosemary's Baby, Omen) trying
their hand in this supernatural and religious thriller genre, this film
tries a somewhat different look to it (but those demon voices coming out
of Frankie, sure sounded like Linda Blair's possessed voice in the
Exorcist). Some of the things the filmmaker tried to do can certainly be
questioned as to their effectiveness, especially the over-the-top
special effects (especially weak was the fire during the closing scene,
it was overwrought with symbolism and inaccuracies) and, what might even
be a worst cheapening of the film, was the romantic suggestions between
the handsome priest and the troubled girl who just wanted to get her
life back and "loves being me." In my opinion, these were distractions
to an already complicated story, a story if it is to be taken seriously
has to remain focused on what it was aiming for and not try to tell more
of the corruptions in the Catholic Church than it could handle.
The romantic hints between the two were fine to a certain extent, it
made the point that a priest's disavowal of sex has its complications
just like sex does for ordinary people. But when it went for overkill
and tried to show how human the priest was, that he was more affected by
saving the girl's life and giving her love than he was in preserving
church dogma, I just thought it became too cheesy to show him in bed
with her and ogling her like he was in love with her, that, for me, was
going over the top. I have no idea where the director was trying to go
with that. It just opened the film up for unnecessary criticism, and I
wanted this film to succeed without those kind of distractions because I
thought it was onto something. What it had to say was a rational
response to such an authoritarian institution that cannot readily accept
challenges from within or without. I don't see the story as an
anti-religious film, as much as I saw it as a challenge to having one
way of looking at religion. In order to challenge the church, there is
no doubt that feathers have to be ruffled, but as I saw the film, the
Catholic community was mostly treated with respect and the essential
need for religion was never in question. It is only from the film's
ogre, sneeringly played by Jonathan Pryce, that we see a one-dimensional
predictable performance. He is evil from- the beginning to the end- of
the film, and how he ends up is just Hollywood hokum, leaving me
disappointed that the filmmaker would abandon their philosophical
argument via the force of ideas and have to resort to making the
Cardinal look like a strangler. Wainwright should have had enough
convictions in the strong ideas he presented about his kind of religion
being a personal one and should have let the quick lesson he gave us on
how the church examines miracles, to be enough of a case against the
church and let it go at that.
I was mostly impressed with Gabriel Byrne as a priest. His low-key
approach to this role was the glue that held the film together and made
it possible for non-believers such as me, to believe that there was some
faint hope for the church to actually be spiritual in a universal and
unbiased sense. I was not particularly moved by Patricia Arquette's
performance, as the young lady who was afraid that she was dying for
something she didn't believe in. I just couldn't warm up to her sexy
dumb hairdresser characterization, it seemed too funky and since she was
the brunt of most of the special effects, it all seemed like an Exorcist
movie going on for too long, losing any rationality and prospective of
what this film was supposed to be about.
Depending on what you are looking for when you view this movie, is what
kind of reaction you should have to it. If you view it as a horror
movie, then you are in for a big disappointment. This film is more silly
than scary, and less funny than risible. But if you look upon it as a
challenging religious conspiratory film, the way I saw it, a film that
examines the past power structure of the church and the power that the
church has today, then you might see a film that is more interesting
than you would be led to believe by the way it was advertised and by the
way some critics felt that it was their duty to defend the "poor"
Catholic Church from such an attack. In any case, I thought the film was
not anti- religious, just critical of churchly abuses, which makes it a
disturbing film in some circles.
In my opinion, despite all its faults, the film is still a thinking
man's film. That the church has blindly protested the movie, is of no
concern to me. I think, on the contrary, they should be grateful for
this film; we seem to be living at a time when a lot of people realize
that they can't look someplace other than to themselves for answers and
people are either fleeing from religion or coming back to it to look for
deeper answers or looking for completely new religious experiences
(drugs, cults, spirtualism, etc.). The filmmakers have not disavowed the
institution of the church or belief in a God, but just question its
search for truth. The film raised some serious questions that should be
answered by the church. By protesting this movie without recognizing
that many people don't want to have religion forced down their throat,
leaves the church in a vulnerable position (no one questions their right
to do that, just the wisdom of their protest). This film should be seen
as an opportunity for the church to see what those who are critical of
it are saying and they should not be afraid of the truth, even if it
means they have to change.
It is easy to lose track that this film is a serious one, despite the
MTV feel the movie has to it, and that is what surprised me more than
anything else about it. But what makes it fascinating, is why the
filmmaker thinks the church can be toppled by this new gospel. In the
past the church has always been able to be astute and co-opt anything it
gets its hands on, for its own benefit. A better film would have veered
away from the sensational and stuck to the nuts and bolts of its
argument. But with that being said, it is interesting to hear what the
director Rupert Wainwright says, `It was our goal to present this story
as an unbelievable, yet wholly possible phenomenon,' and like it or not
that's what the film does.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
Stigmata was marketed as horror, when it's not. It's a religious thriller.
There is a difference. Whereas (good) horror startles and disturbs you, the
religious thriller unseats you, unsettles you. Doesn't make you leave the
light on. Think Omen, Exorcist, not Prophecy. All the same though, Stigmata
is a bit more upbeat than Omen or Exorcist, which translates into less
unsettling (more reassuring). But the dramatics are all there.
It opens with Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), the Vatican's
miracle-debunker, doing his job in Brazil. And of course he stumbles onto
the real thing. And of course no one believes him. Cut to Philadelphia,
where a certain Brazilian artifact has found Frankie Paige (Patricia
Arquette), who, as the trailer's already told us, starts manifesting
stigmata. Kiernan comes to investigate, which involves the mandatory initial
doubting session followed soon enough by eventual conversion. All of this is
typical, right down to Kiernan, the scientist who's a preacher who's a
scientist who's Damian Karras, Doubting Thomas etc.
What isn't typical, though, is legion. First, there's the Romeo + Juliet-ish
camera/editing work, which lends an MTV quality to everything-fast-paced,
high-decibel, undeniable. Second, there's something like a social
indictment/imperative buried in all the techno-distraction: that the church
has become more important than religion. Third, there's no choir-singing
whatsoever, which is odd in a movie so consciously derivative that it hides
secrets in photographs (qua Omen), pancakes make-up on its Linda Blair
character, has doves exploding into the sky left and right, all that.
It does work, though, for about three-quarters of its runtime (before Rome
comes to Philadelphia, with no brotherly love). Especially effective are the
lengths writer Tom Lazarus goes to to establish that Frankie is definitely
not worthy of the stigmata, so something else must be going on. Something
is, as Kiernan--the ex-communicated detective of Stigmata--slowly finds out.
And it's more or less the same story as The Name of the Rose, or, more
recently, pi: there exists somewhere out there a lost book (in pi, number)
which can change the world. Meaning the people who are happy with the world
as it is don't want that book being discovered.
Effective also is the structuring of Stigmata. Like Se7en, which is
structured around the seven deadly sins, Stigmata is structured around the
five wounds of Jesus Christ during crucifixion, only here each wound ups the
ante via pushing Frankie that much closer to death, meaning she's a victim
in need of saving. Not quite as effective is Kiernan's occasional ignorance,
when he asks obvious questions for us about the gospels and such, which is
supposed to function as narrative exposition but instead makes his character
a little less believable each time. Too--and even though a token explanation
is offered--there seems to be no reason for Frankie to talk in demon-voices,
tell you lies, fake flames, etc. Or, the only viable explanation isn't
within the story but in what we expect: the creepy dissonance of Patricia
Arquette talking with a male voice. It is unsettling, it just doesn't quite
fit in a movie that tries to be so loyal to the academic side of things.
Twice as unsettling as the demon-voices, though, is an early shot of a woman
and baby and a lot of traffic, which is where Stigmata is strongest: in
director Rupert Wainwright's meticulously composed audio-visual moment, when
he's got all the religious iconography standing small yet important against
a modern backdrop. It doesn't quite make us want to go to church as Omen
did, or leave us feeling dirty as Exorcist did, but all the same, Stigmata
does leave us with questions, which at least feel a lot like doubts, which
is what the religious thriller uses to unsettle us. Even the religious
thrillers with MTV appeal.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Greg King
STIGMATA (M).  
(MGM/UIP)
Director: Rupert Wainwright
Stars: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Enrico 
Colantoni, Dick Latessa, Thomas Kopache, Ann Cusack, Portia De Rossi,
Patrick Muldoon, Rade Sherbedgia
Running time: 102 minutes.
It's rare to find a spooky religious thriller that is also
quite intelligent and doesn't lose the plot amidst a welter of
meaningless effects and nonsense.  Admittedly, Stigmata is often
reminiscent of earlier films like The Exorcist, The Omen and the
risible Demi Moore thriller The Seventh Sign, but this thriller about
possession is grounded in some solid concepts and ideas that push the
material in different directions.
Although primarily a supernatural thriller, Stigmata also
deals with themes of organised religion versus true faith, and is
shaped by some in-depth research into the Bible and Biblical history.
It also explores internal politics and corruption within the Vatican,
where cliques of ambitious priests have built their own solid power
base.  But these potentially contentious and worthwhile ideas are
occasionally let down by some cliched, Exorcist inspired touches,
such as possessed people speaking in strange voices, levitation,
spontaneously moving furniture, etc.
Gabriel Byrne (recently seen as the devil in End Of Days)
plays Father Andrew Kiernan, a Vatican priest with a scientific
background, who travels the world disproving so-called miracles.  He
is sent to Pittsburgh to handle the case of a young woman who is
reportedly afflicted with "stigmata" - unexplained, bloody marks
corresponding with the wounds suffered by Christ on the cross.
Frankie (Patricia Arquette, from True Romance, etc) is a young
hairdresser, who is not particularly religious, and who is bewildered
and scared by the mysterious events that have suddenly haunted her.
Kiernan discovers that she is possessed by the spirit of a devout
South American priest who recently died.  But there are some within
the church who would rather silence Frankie than have what she
represents revealed to the world.  Kiernan finds his own beliefs
tested by helping Frankie.
In a physically demanding role, Arquette is superb, capturing
both a vulnerability and inner strength that grounds her performance
in reality.  Byrne is also very good, and he gives a much more
intelligent and restrained performance here than in End Of Days.
British-born director Rupert Wainwright (the bland Disney
comedy Blank Check, etc) hails from a background in commercials and
music videos, and these origins are evident in the distinctive and
stylish visuals and overall production design.  Especially striking is
the opening credit sequence, which combines the back story to Stigmata
with eerie visuals, and which has become almost commonplace now
through films like Seven, Resurrection and End Of Days, etc.
The film is also heavily drenched in symbolism - dripping
water, fire, blood, breaking glass, and flying doves - all filmed in
slow motion and close up, and accompanied by an evocative music score
by Billy Corgan, from The Smashing Pumpkins.  Jeffrey Kimball's
cinematography is also beautifully moody and adds to the edgy quality
of this effective and surprisingly entertaining horror thriller.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Cast: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Rade 
Sherbedgia, Portia De Rossi, Jack Donner.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 11, 1999.
Not knowing any better, I would have guessed that "Stigmata," the new 
religious-themed possession tale, is just a fancy name for "Exorcist IV," and 
I may be right. Let's look at the evidence: a young woman possessed; a priest 
struggling with his own beliefs and feelings; mysteriously-inflicted slash 
marks; a climactic possession sequence; and pea soup. Well, okay, pea soup 
maybe be an exaggeration, but it might as well have been included, for, as 
directed by Rupert Wainwright, the film's only major differences to the 
classic 1973 horror film, "The Exorcist," are a quick-cut style for those 
whose attention span has been depleted by MTV, and a disappointing lack of 
any believable human story. On second thought, perhaps "Stigmata" is actually 
"Beyond the Door IV," in disguise.
In a prologue set in a dusty, Catholic region of Brazil, an American woman 
purchases a rosary that once belonged to Father Paulo Alameida (Jack Donner), 
who is now lying in a coffin in a nearby church, the statue of Mary beside 
him bleeding human blood from its eyes. Switch to the city of Pittsburgh, 
23-year-old Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a talented beautician who, at 
night, likes to go club (and man)-hopping with her best friend (Nia Long), 
receives a gift from her mother that has arrived at her front door. Among the 
small presents is the rosary she bought in Brazil, and soon after, Frankie is 
attacked in her bath tub by an unknown force that causes her wrists to bleed 
straight through, as if large pegs had been nailed into her. At the hospital, 
the wounds are suspected to be self-inflicted, despite Frankie's argument 
that she loves herself and has no stress ("I cut hair!"). Before long, she 
also is tortured with slash marks across her body while on an out-of-control 
subway cart, thorn cuts on her face, and occasionally is being possessed and 
forced to recite the Aramaic language, which hasn't been used in thousands of 
years. Enter Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a part priest/part 
scientist from the Vatican, who travels to Pittsburgh to try and help 
Frankie. His guess is that she has the curse of the stigmata, the inflicted 
wounds of christ, and since she has had four of the five major wounds, she is 
in grave danger of dying if it occurs again. There's just one catch: 
Stigmatics are always highly religious individuals, while Frankie is an 
atheist who is quickly starting to believe in otherwordly forces.
"Stigmata" is a relentless and thoroughly unpleasant horror film that is so 
fast-paced and stylized, with loud alternative music and quick cuts popping 
up at every chance it gets, that the whole experience of watching it 
gradually became an ordeal. In one scene after the next, we watch Frankie 
being graphically mutilated by something we cannot see, and while it 
sometimes is powerful and unsettling, that mostly results from all of the 
bloodletting. In between, there are painfully few exposition scenes in which 
we get to know the characters because, every time some dialogue enters in, 
Frankie abruptly is pierced through her feet or various other body parts. A 
major flaw this is, because in order to care about this woman who is in a 
dire situation in which any moment could be her last, we have to be able to 
sympathize with her plight. According to screenwriters Tom Lazarus and Rick 
Ramage, their idea of satisfying character development is showing Frankie 
smoking and drinking at clubs, and then bringing men home with her. Patricia 
Arquette, who, at 31, admittedly looks a little long in the tooth to be 
playing a 23-year-old, tries her best in an unlikable role that helps none in 
displaying her considerable, but usually wasted, acting chops. 
Gabriel Byrne fares better, as a priest who is dedicated to his profession, 
but not enough to turn away from a romantic subplot that forms between 
Frankie and himself. And why the heck not? Byrne may very well be one of the 
better-looking priest characters in any movie I've seen (certainly more so 
than the various Fathers in "The Exorcist"), and aside from this casting 
flaw, he really is a strong presence in his more challenging moments 
on-screen.
At times, the repititious violence that fills the screen throughout grows 
overly tedious (I mean, how many near-fatal wounds can a normal person get 
without dying?), and the supporting characters may have helped break up the 
grisliness of the proceedings. They, too, are severely wasted, particularly 
Nia Long (a fine actress in her own right), who is stuck playing the 
"concerned friend" character. Unlike most, though, the film doesn't even 
follow through with her, as she disappears midway through and is never seen 
again.
As "Stigmata" plays out its bag of tricks, continuously growing more and more 
ludicrous with each passing moment until it completely collapses in its 
fire-and-brimstone climactic exorcism, one is led to wonder exactly how 
anyone would like the film. The story developments and character interactions 
are especially unrewarding, particularly the ending, which is supposed to be 
a greatly touching moment, but only comes off as cornball. The film 
ultimately leaves a bitter taste in your mouth, mostly from its lack of 
emotion, and comes off feeling overblown rather than the least bit scary. I 
think I've changed my mind about "Stigmata" being the third sequel in the 
famous possession series; on second thought, it's more akin to "Exorcist II: 
The Heretic."
 - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    NZone Magazine

Author
Brandon Herring 
Rated R for violence and gore, some language and sexuality.
Starring: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Nia Long, Jonathan Pryce, Ann
Cusack.
Let me see this is what the millionth movie made about possession? Let me
rephrase the movie title: The Exorcist 4: Stigmata, no nevermind. Although
'Stigmata' might as well be Exorcist 4 is has everything to do it, priest,
possessed woman, ending about possession. It only lacks one thing: scares. The
film was not scary but more freaky that jumps at you and makes you jump instead
of being truly scared. It has a good plot and an original idea, but the way the
movie is conceived and way the movie is directed is way over the edge with
overblown visual style.
The movie starts in Brazil where Father Andrew Keirnan who is investigating a
statue of mary crying blood. The loved priest of that town had died, which was
what he was supposed to be looking at he however heard of the crying statue.
Then we see a woman buying the cross-necklace which belonged to the now
deceased preist. That woman is the mom of Frankie Page (Patricia Arqutte) whom
gives Frankie the necklace. Frankie lives a normal life, she's a hairdresser,
has a best friend and a boyfriend.
One night she's taking a bath, all of a sudden we see flashes of someone
getting their hands nailed down to something, and we see frankies wrists have
holes in them. She is rushed to the hospital and the doctors patch her all up
and make her feel better. When the priests overseas hear about this they send
Andrew in to investigate. When another attack comes upon Frankie in a subway a
priest on the bus sees it whom tells the priests that he thinks she has
stigmata. Andrew talks to the girl and asks her if she believes in God, she
replies 'no'. He explains to her that only deeply religious people are
inflicted with Stigmata. What is Stigmata you ask? Well it's when a person
exhibits the wounds of Christ, in example holes through the wrists, gashes on
the forehead, holes in feet, slash marks on back and finally a spear through
the side.
Why does Frankie have Stigmata? Well I shouldn't tell cause it will ruin the
movie, but it's really not a great plot twist in the movie or very surprising.
The movie has what some will call 'MTV style editing' with rock music and fast
flashes of stuff. What really got me was how much Patricia Arquette was miscast
in the role of Frankie, however she does the best she can and does a good job
of what she has to work with. Gabriel Byrne is the same thing and ironically
plays Satan in the upcoming End Of Days.
The visual style of the film is good for a while, then you get kind of tired of
it. Slow motion, close-ups of something someone touches. The movies direction
was good, but was a little hokey at times. Screenplay for the film was
well-conceived as well as the plot, but the movie isn't as good as the plot. It
has some holes that leaves us asking questions and wanting to know stuff that
it doesn't explain. Sadly the movie isn't too scary, some of the Stigmata
attacks mostly the subway one is probably the scariest if even that of the
film.
The movie is far from being bad it's just that it is a big let-down. Another
problem with the movie was that it had too many endings and not enough
substance to back them up. In fact some of the sequences and talky scenes were
downright boring and un-interesting. The last thirty minutes of the movie are a
waste and really waste the movie. The final climatic scene is quite un-scary
and goes way to fast. If your in the mood for a good, loud thriller 'Stigmata'
is for you. But if your like me and really don't feel like seeing an Exorcist 4
then don't. It has the style, the acting and the story however the substance is
missing as well as it's impact on the audience. Go see 'The Sixth Sense' before
anything, it has to be the best of the year!
Reviewed by Brandon Herring October 19, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html
